Dale Gribble: I know what's wrong with it. It's a Ford. You know what they say 
Ford stands for, don't ya? It stands for 'Fix it again, Tony'.
Hank Hill: You're thinking of a Fiat, Dale.
Dale Gribble: Fix... it... again...
%
Hank Hill: Whatcha listenin' to, son?
Bobby Hill: I don't think you'd like it.
Hank Hill: Well, why not? I like this new generation of music. [puts headphones 
on]
Old woman on tape: Hello?
%
[The tape erupts into sudden flatulence]
Hank Hill: [takes headphones off] Mother of God, it's all toilet sounds! Where 
did you record this?
Bobby Hill: I bought it at the mall! It's the Funny Phone Jerks!
Hank Hill: Let me tell you, Bobby, there's nothing "funny" about these sounds! 
What that person on your tape has is a medical disorder. Now you get ready for 
the game, OK?
Bobby Hill: Yes, sir.
Hank Hill: [leaving Bobby's room] That boy ain't right.
%
The Hill family on the way to Bobby's baseball game.
Hank Hill: So, are you ready to kick some Wildcat butt, Bobby?
Bobby Hill: Okay.
Peggy Hill: Nah, don't you worry, son. You just do your best.
Hank Hill: Don't listen to her, Bobby. If you wanna win, you're gonna have to 
do better than your best.
Bobby Hill: How do I do that?
Hank Hill: You gotta give a hundred and ten percent. That's what'll give you 
that winnin' edge.
Bobby Hill: But what if the Wildcats give a hundred and ten percent, too?
Hank Hill: Well, then you gotta try even harder.
Peggy Hill: How about if Bobby gave a hundred and twelve percent?
Hank Hill: Ahm ... sure, that'd work.
Bobby Hill: Or maybe a hundred and thirteen?
Hank Hill: [Annoyed] Yeah, yeah, that's even better.
Peggy Hill: No, uh, I don't know. Thirteen is a very unlucky number.
Hank Hill: Look, we're not talking about thirteen. We're talking about a 
hundred and thirteen, and even ... uh ... okay, give a hundred and twelve, 
what's the difference? Look, Bobby. Just do your best, okay?
%
Hank and Bobby at the Mega Lo Mart after Bobby got a black eye at his baseball 
game.
Hank Hill: Excuse me, where's the hardware department?
Buckley: [Clueless] Where is the hardware department? Uhm, hm, what exactly is 
it you're looking for?
Hank Hill: The hardware department.
Buckley: Yeah, but are you looking for like a tool or something?
Hank Hill: What difference does it make?
Buckley: Huh, what difference does it make?
Hank Hill: Okay, I'm lookin' for a tap-and-die and some WD-40.
Buckley: Huh, what is it that you're trying to do?
Hank Hill: [Losing patience] I'm tryin' to buy a tap-and-die and some WD-40 and 
get out of this God-forsaken store!
Buckley: Uh ... and what is a tap-and-die?
Hank Hill: Okay, forget it! Let's say I want a hammer. Do you know what a 
hammer is? That's what I want, a damned hammer! Now where in the hell would I 
go?
Nearby Customer 1: Hey, that's that Hank Hill fella that lives on the block 
next to us.
Nearby Customer 2: He sure has a temper, doesn't he?
Nearby Customer 1: Sure does. Makes you wonder who gave his boy that black eye.
%
Bobby knocks over some cans swinging a cardboard roll around.
Buckley: You're gonna have to pay for that, dude.
Hank Hill: [Shouting] You're fired!
%
Hank is fixing his truck.
Hank Hill: [referring to the sound of Bobby throwing a baseball at the living 
room wall] Dammit! There it is again! Where is that thumpin' comin' from? It's 
drivin' me crazy!
Dale Gribble: Could be far-off helicopters... U.N. helicopters.
Hank Hill: Dale! What're you doin'? Give me some light! Now! I can't see! (Hank 
drops his wrench) Ow, my arm! (The hood closes) Ow, my head!
%
Dale runs off
A Child Protective Services worker interviews the family after a report for 
Bobby's black eye.
Anthony Page: Mr. Hill, I feel that you're coming from an anger mindset, and if 
you're projecting this anger onto me, it gives me grave concerns as to how you 
facilitate your son's growth in private.
Hank Hill: Mister, I have not begun to project my anger onto you!
%
Hank Hill: Now you listen to me, mister. I work for a livin', and I mean real 
work, not writin' down gobbledegook! I provide the people of this community 
with propane and propane accessories. Oh, when I think of all my hard earned 
tax dollars goin' ta pay a bunch of little twig-boy bureaucrats like you, it 
just makes me wanna ... oh ... oh God ... it just ...
Peggy Hill: Hank?
Hank Hill: Honey, bring me my BC headache powder and a glass of water.
Peggy Hill: Alright, Hank.
Hank Hill: Now you listen here. You see that boy? That's my boy! And if you 
ever try to take him away, so help me God, I'll tear ya a new one bigger'n the 
Grand Canyon! Now I want you to get out of my house, yer not welcome here! I 
mean now, before I give you a black eye! Git!
%
Bill Dauterive Dale, are you sure you want to be messin' with Hank's truck when 
he's not around?
Dale Gribble: I'm gonna help get him this alternator off. (Dale cuts a wire).
Bill: Ah, Dale, I think ya released the brake cable! Dale?
Dale: No, I didn't. (The truck crashes into the garage door). I guess I'd 
better get goin', ah, I got some edging to do. (Dale grabs his cap out of the 
engine and he, along with Bill and Boomhauer, run back to their homes).
%
Dale Gribble: [regarding global warming] I say let the world warm up, see what 
Boutros Boutros-Ghali-Ghali thinks about that! We'll grow oranges in Alaska.
Hank Hill: Dale, you giblet-head, we live in Texas. It's already a hundred and 
ten in the summer, and if it gets one degree hotter, I'm gonna kick your ass!
%
Hank Hill: Bobby, you can't make an omelette without breakin' eggs, and you 
can't get on base without takin' a swing.
Bobby Hill: The pitcher could walk me, couldn't he?
Hank Hill: Don't play lawyer-ball, son.
%
Jeff Boomhauer: [discussing Seinfeld] See that part where dang ol' George come 
in there, he talks 'bout tastin' his own burp and Kramer comes slidin' in there 
just like he always does. I tell ya what, man, them dang ol' New York boys, 
just a show about nothin'.
%
Bobby is talking with Joseph
Bobby: (Mocking his dad) Git out my house! My boy ain't much, but he's all I 
got!
%
Hank: (Hank is lying on the bed) It's hard, Peggy. I don't wanna lose my little 
boy. My only son. But, oh, it's hard.
Peggy: Well, you can relax. The investigation has been off for a week, only 
Bobby didn't tell us.
Hank: I'LL KILL HIM!!!!!
Peggy: Alright, calm down, honey. Now, let me explain. He didn't do it to be 
mean, Bobby honestly doesn't think you love him all the time.
Hank: That's crazy, 'Course I love him.
Peggy: Very good. Now, say it to Bobby.
Hank: What are you talkin' about?
Peggy: I want you to tell Bobby that your love for him is unconditional.
Hank: Well, I can't say that. I can't! You know how I was raised! What my 
father's like!
Cotton: (shown in a flashback to Hank's youth) I got my shins blowed off by a 
Japanman's machine gun, so don't come cryin' to me with your problems!
Peggy: Honey, I'm begging you. For the sake of this family, you have got to do 
it. He's waiting for you out on the porch.
Hank: Ah, jeez. Twig-boy coming over here... (Hank goes outside and talks to 
Bobby) Uh, you, uh, you're my son, uh, well, you know with everything uh, that 
entails, uh...
Bobby: Uh-huh.
Hank: Uh, huh, you know, uh, feelings of, uh, fondness, and more, uh, heh, uh, 
you know what I mean, don't you, boy?
Bobby: No.
Hank: Uhh, well uh, (Hank makes a weird sound) Huh, that's a hell of a weird 
sound, I've never made that before. Uh, I, you, uh, family. You're not making 
this easy on me, boy. (sighs) Okay, I love you no matter what you do. There, 
phew, let's go get something to eat.
Bobby: I'm not, just a big disappointment to you?
Hank: Disappointment? No, you make me proud. I've been disappointed by just 
about everything else in this town, but you? Not once. Dammit, you're my boy. 
Heh, you know better than that. (Bobby laughing)
Anthony Page: He punched him! I, I knew it! I told them! Did-did you see that?
Guy: See what, twig-boy?
Anthony Page: (sighs) Never mind.
%
Peggy is attempting to say the names of reproductive organs for a sexual 
education class.:
Peggy Hill: Happiness. Happ-i-ness. Ha-penis. Penis. I did it! Ovaries. Uvula. 
Uterus. VAAAGINA!
[Hank does a spit-take with his beer.]:
Peggy: Hey Hank, I just said...
Hank: I heard ya. The whole neighborhood can hear you cussing.
Peggy: It's not cussing Hank, to say the name of a god-given body part.
Hank: Well it is if it's the part of a body that was meant to be concealed by 
an undergarment. You're dealing with organs that people just don't want to know 
about.
Peggy: Well, Bobby ought to know about 'em. We don't want him growing up as 
repressed as we did.
Hank: Sure we do. I'm drawing the line here, Peggy. My son is not gonna learn 
this crazy crap! It says right here that he can't take the class without 
permission from both his parents!
Peggy: Now, just hold on. Are you saying I'm not good enough to teach my own 
son?!
Hank: If you do not approve, you do not have to sign, and I do not approve. 
Permission denied!
%
Peggy: Now, Bobby, you may have noticed that there is a difference between a 
man and a woman.
%
Bobby remains silent
Peggy: ...a rather obvious difference.
%
Bobby remains silent for a few more moments
Bobby: You mean the penis?
%
Peggy, unsure of how to proceed, stands up and walks out of the room.
[Dale is leaving a message on the Hill's answering machine]
Dale Gribble: You don't know who I am, but I know where you live and you better 
cut it out if you know what's good for you. Oh, and Hank, we changed that 
tee-off time to 3:00.
%
Hank Hill: [As a child] When I grow up, I want to sell propane and propane 
accessories, if my grades are good enough!
%
Hank Hill: We of the Order of the Straight Arrow call upon the spirit 
Wematanye, protector of the sacred ground that brings us cool water to drink 
and energy-efficient clean-burning propane gas for all our sacred heating and 
cooking needs. Wematanye says, respect the earth! She's ours, by God, our taxes 
pay for Her. Also, it says here you gotta love all Her creatures. Let's 
see...oh, here we go: Though we walk through the valley of the shadow of death, 
you're gonna recommend us to the spirit in the sky, with liberty and justice 
for all. Wematanye is with you, and with Texas. Amen.
%
Luanne: Fish sticks? (begins to cry)
%
Hank Hill: (repeated line) You look pretty.
%
Hank Hill: Your heart is telling you?! Who's the boss, you or your heart? You 
are! Your heart is your employee! So get your heart off its butt and back to 
work!
%
Peggy is dreaming about Hank's funeral.
Bill Dauterive: He looks like an angel. A dead angel.
Jeff Boomhauer: (crying) Why, man, dang ol' why, why?!
Dale Gribble: It should have been Bill!
Peggy Hill: Oh, Hank. We never got a chance to talk about your problem. And 
now... we never will.
C. Everett Koop: Remember, early detection is the key. Now pass in your algebra 
homework.
Cotton Hill: Goodbye, boy. See you in HELL!
%
Cotton turns a toilet handle on Hank's headstone. Hank's coffin is sucked into 
the ground.
Nancy Gribble: (on TV) The temperature is a pleasant 70 degrees. And on a more 
personal note, I'd like to wish my friend Hank Hill a quick recovery from his 
embarrassing consti-
%
Hank changes the channel.
C. Everett Koop: -pation.
%
Hank Hill: (While constipated and watching his dog poo outside) Showoff.
Hank Hill:"Don't touch me. I'm on the John."
%
Hank Hill: What the hell kind of country is this where I can only hate a man if 
he's white?
%
Peggy Hill: Do you... do you think my feet are too big, Hank?
Hank Hill: No, hon. Just... more of you to love.
%
[He takes a step forward towards her, like an on-screen embrace]
Peggy Hill: Ow.
%
[Hanks looks down to see he's stepping on Peggy's feet]
Hank Hill: Oh, sorry.
%
Minh Souphanousinphone: Kahn, please. For once try not to piss off neighbor. We 
kicked out of Laos, we kicked out of Anaheim... I tired of running.
%
Hank meets Kahn for the first time.
Hank Hill: So are you Chinese or Japanese?
Kahn Souphanousinphone: I live in California last twenty year, but, ah... first 
come from Laos.
Hank Hill: Huh?
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Laos. We Laotian.
Bill Dauterive: The ocean? What ocean?
Kahn Souphanousinphone: We are Laotianfrom Laos, stupid! It's a landlocked 
country in southeast Asia. It's between Vietnam and Thailand, OK? Population 
4.7 million.
%
Hank ponders this for a few seconds.
Hank Hill: So are you Chinese or Japanese?
Kahn Souphanousinphone: [groans]
%
Hank Hill: He thinks just 'cause I'm from Texas that means I'm a redneck. 
Chinese people and their stupid stereotypes!
%
Dale Gribble: They'll probably get you with a blow-dart; that's their way. But 
you'll just think its a mosquito bite until you die, then you'll know the truth.
%
Kahn Souphanousinphone:: I could just stay home, order a bucket of chicken and 
watch Hee Haw; same thing [as going to the Hills' for dinner].
%
Hank Hill: You know Kahn, we may deny our kids completely different deserts, 
but they both go to bed hungry, and that's what really matters.
%
Cotton discovers that Bobby began a sexist riot at his school.
Cotton Hill: Bobby, I'm proud of what you did at school today....So I'm buyin' 
you a hooker!
%
Hank thanks Cotton for bringing a horse ("Oh Dad, you didn't have to do this.")
Cotton Hill: Well, you know me I'm larger than life.
%
Cotton tells the story of how he was injured in WWII: "I was 14, just a little 
older than Bobby. But I knew Uncle Sam needed me, so I lied and signed up. We 
had beat the Nazzys in Italy, and they shipped me to the Pacific theater. A 
Tojo torpedo sent our troop ship to the bottom. I could only save three of my 
buddies: Fatty, Stinky, and Brooklyn. They were kind of like you fellas [to 
Bill, Dale, and Boomhauer], only one of them was from Brooklyn. Out of the sun 
came a Tojo Zero and put fitty bullets in my back. The blood attracted sharks. 
I had to give 'em Fatty. Then things took a turn for the worse. I made it to an 
island, but it was full of Tojos! They were spitting on the U.S. flag! So I 
rushed 'em, but it was a trap. They opened fire and blew my shins off. Last 
thing I remember, I beat 'em all to death with a big piece of Fatty. I woke up 
in a field hospital, and they were sewing my feet to my knees."
Bobby Hill: [Speaking to Joseph about Connie]: Oow. She's moody. Must be PBS.
%
Hank Hill: Now you listen to me! THE NAME IS HANK HILL! MR. HANK HILL! PEGGY 
MARRIED ME! I DIDN'T MARRY HER! What are you
%
Peggy Hill: (crying) I am so stupid!
Hank Hill: Aw, you're not stupid. Heck, you're smarter than me.
Peggy Hill: Oh, big deal.
Hank Hill: Well, you're smarter than anyone else in Arlen.
Peggy Hill: Well, whoop-dee-do. I am the smartest hillbilly in Hillbillytown.
Hank Hill: I-I'm trying Peggy. I just... hey, you know, Coach always used to 
say something that would fire us up when we were behind.
Peggy Hill: Yeah, what?
Hank Hill: LOSER! YOU'RE A LOSER! ARE YOU FEELING SORRY FOR YOURSELF?! WELL, 
YOU SHOULD BE CAUSE YOU ARE DIRT! YOU MAKE ME SICK YOU BIG BABY! BABY WANT A 
BOTTLE?! A BIG DIRT BOTTLE?!
Peggy Hill: (crying) Why are you yelling at me?
Hank Hill: Uh, well, I'm trying to be your coach. I... It's... It's inspiring.
Peggy Hill: Well, thank you, cause I feel worse than ever.
Hank Hill: Well, it worked for the team.
Peggy Hill: No, It didn't. You went to State and lost.
Hank Hill: Ah, jeez. I think I need one of those $8 beers.
%
[Minh has just lost $13 to Peggy playing Boggle.]
Minh Souphanousinphone: Thank you for Boggle lesson, Peggy Hill. Maybe next 
weekend I teach you mahjong. Bring your checkbook!
%
Hank Hill: Is this John occupied? Esta es Juan occupado?
Bobby Hill: Sí.
%
Joseph Gribble: Dad, I'm sorry! I'll never smoke again.
Dale Gribble: Whoa, hold on, son! I want you to keep an open mind so you can 
make an informed decision. If you want, you can read a bloated government 
report on smoking or go straight to the horse's mouth and get the facts from 
the tobacco industry.
%
Hank Hill: For God's sakes, Bobby, what nationality are you?
Bobby Hill: American.
Hank Hill: Then why are you holding your cigarette like some kind of European 
Nazi in a movie?
Bobby Hill: Why does it matter? I thought smoking was bad.
Hank Hill: That's not the right sort of attitude for you to have. Whatever you 
do, you should do right, even if it's something wrong.
%
Hank Hill: Uh, I got to go do some stuff. I think I might have left the blender 
turned on.
%
Peggy Hill: (to Bobby) Only trailer trash smoke nowadays. Do you wanna look 
like trailer trash?
Luanne Platter: (crying) That's not fair! I don't smoke!
%
Peggy Hill: Oh, honey, you are not trash just 'cause you grew up in a trailer 
and your mama's in prison.
%
Peggy Hill: Uh, Hank, there is a "tile" in the bathroom that I think we missed.
Hank Hill: Really? Well, I better check that out.
Hank goes into the bathroom, sees a cigarette, smokes a few puffs, then returns 
to the kitchen.
Hank Hill: Heh-heh-heh. Well, I found the "tile" — thank you very much, Peggy 
— and I looked at it but there's still some more "tile" for you to look at.
Peggy Hill: You know, I think I will save the rest of my "tile" for after 
breakfast.
Bobby Hill: Will you quit talking about your stupid tile?! If it's so dirty go 
clean it, and if it's clean you can shut up!
He stubs out his breakfast sausage as if it were a cigarette and leaves the 
table.
%
Hank Hill: (at a cold turkey support group meeting, glaring at the counselor) I 
got the strangest feeling someone's gonna kick his ass.
%
Kick the Butt Club Counselor: Hey, there, why don't you tell us your name and 
how long you've been smoking.
Hank Hill: Uh, I'd rather not.
Kick the Butt Club Counselor: I understand. It's not easy to admit we're weak.
Hank Hill: You're calling me weak? Look at your little birdy arms, they're no 
thicker than a cigarette. I could smoke them little arms.
%
Kick the Butt Club Counselor: It's beautiful how you came out to support your 
daddy.
Bobby Hill: I'm a smoker, too.
Everyone gasps.
Kick the Butt Club Counselor: How long have you been addicted to cigarettes?
Bobby Hill: Since my dad let me smoke a whole carton.
Hank Hill: Wait a minute, I didn't let him, I made him. It was a punishment.
Bill Dautrieve: Can I get a new buddy?
Audience member: What is wrong with him?
Kick the Butt Club Counselor: You are sick, sir! You shouldn't be allowed to 
have children!
Hank Hill: Now hold on a minute here. I didn't bring my family here to be 
yelled at. I don't think I like this club. You all whine too much, and the 
coffee's bad. I'll tell you what you need to do. You need to take a thirteenth 
step... down off your high horse!
%
Luanne Platter: Here's to three of the bravest individuals in all of Arlen. To 
the Hills and their tobacco-free future!
Hank Hill: My God, are you still talking?
Bobby Hill: Why's my potato got skin on it? I hate skin!
Peggy Hill: I will not sit here and have my work insulted. What, do you think 
the potatoes just fly into the bowl and mash themselves?!
Luanne Platter: I know y'all don't mean none of those harsh words. It's just 
the nicotine withdrawal.
Hank Hill: Why is she still talking?!
%
Peggy Hill: Well, look at us. At each other's throats. And after all we've been 
through. This family has survived fires and twisters and every strain of flu 
the Orient could throw at us. Well, we are not going to be done in by a lousy 
tobacco leaf.
%
(Note: the following quote comes from a deleted scene.)
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Put on shoes, hillbilly!
%
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Where I come from we got this thing called karma. You 
do something bad, it come back and bite you in the ass! Big, white, stubborn 
ass!
%
Bobby Hill: (Hypnotized by the Queen) ...YES... ...MY... ...QUEEN...
%
Hank Hill:(Said to Dale Gribble after he mistakenly thought Dale had died from 
a poisonous ant attack) You gave your life to save my son. I guess that makes 
us even for you ruinin' my lawn. What am I saying? Of course, it makes us even!
%
Bobby:(Talking to a mannequin head) "You look really special tonight."
%
Peggy on what their course of action after catching Bobby kissing the mannequin 
head
Peggy: We'll move to Berlin. Bobby will be accepted there. I read somewhere 
that Germans are a very tolerant people. Their culture admires all kinds of 
freaks.
%
Peggy Hill: I know it is not my fault. If anything, this is your fault. You 
made him go to that camp with no toilet doors.
Hank Hill: Don't point your finger at me, woman. You're the one who parks him 
in front of the TV and makes him watch all them Muppets. They got frogs kissing 
pigs, what the hell did they think was going to happen?
%
The salsa music playing during Bobby's 'seduction' of the plastic head is 
Discarga Criolla by Ray Barreto.
Hank is taking Bobby to the gun club
Bobby Hill: Wow, I always thought this was a crack house.
%
Bobby: Can I put a gun rack on my bike?
Hank: Do you know how long I've been waiting for you to ask me that?
%
Hank Hill: Why don't we get you into one of those safety courses and if you're 
still interested after they've taken all the fun out of it, then we'll see 
about the ponchos and the... uh... tournament.
%
Dale: Guns don't kill people, the government does.
%
Peggy discovers that Hank is not skilled at shooting a rifle.
Peggy Hill: I still love you!
%
Cotton Hill: Sorry I'm late, I had to stop at the wax museum and give the 
finger to FDR.
%
Hank Hill: Six AM and already the boy ain't right...
%
Hank Hill: Don't play mind checkers with me, man. I'm not in the mood.
%
Dale Gribble: This tornado's already registered a level two on the Fujisaki 
[sic] scale. A storm that strong will send an egg through a barn door  two barn 
doors if one of them's open.
%
Dale is driving the Dead Bug with Boomhauer on top of the vehicle, heading for 
the tornado
Dale Gribble: All right, twister. It's just you and me now. Ten years ago you 
took my shed. [the twister's image is reflected on his shades] Did you think 
I'd forget that? Come on, bring it on! [a raindrop hits the windshield] GAAHH!! 
No! Please, let me go! [Dale panics, and the Dead Bug veers out of control]
%
Hank is stopped by decontamination workers that are trying to clean up the 
barrel of ant poison.
Hank Hill: Come on. [honks horn] Come on! Let's go! Move that truck! [a worker 
walks towards his truck] My wife is stuck in Shining Pines.
Decontamination Worker: I'm not authorized to drive the truck, sir.
Hank Hill: My wife is in danger, damn it! Now make something happen!
Decontamination Worker: [blows whistle] SECURITY!!!
%
Bill walks over to Hank's truck.
Hank Hill: Bill, thank God! Make this idiot let me pass.
%
Hank Hill: What did I do to deserve this? I didn't mean to curse my wife to 
Hell!
%
Hank looks at a worker with a vacuum walking towards the container. Lightning 
flashes and Hank sees in the worker's place the Grim Reaper for half a second, 
then reality returns.
Hank Hill: [worried] Ohh...
%
Hank switches the gear into drive, and floors it. The tornado is rapidly 
approaching Shining Pines.
Hank Hill: Ahhh... AAHH!! NO!!!!!!!!!!!
%
Bobby attempts to get an egg thrown through a brick wall via the force of an 
F-5 tornado after Dale's story of such an occurrence.
Bobby Hill: This is the chance I've been waiting for!
%
Bobby throws the egg and it flies back into his face.
Hank:You're tough, Bill.You're the toughest Army barber I know.
Dale:Set your mousse to stun, there, Bill.
%
Nancy is reporting on the tornado.
Nancy Gribble: Mention your home was destroyed, and get a free 5-pound bag of 
onions.
%
Hank Hill: Fine. But I think you owe my lawn an apology. *pauses* We're waiting!
%
Dale is wearing a suit for Halloween.
Dale Gribble: Booooo! I am a high-priced Washington lobbyist, peddling 
influence! Who wants candy?
%
Peggy: Luanne and Bobby are at Junie Harper's house
Hank:[Nearly chokes on his beer before swallowing] I came very close to 
spitting out beer!
%
Luanne: Halloween is a satanic holiday. It was invented by the Dru-ish.
%
Hank: Maybe I should tie the long hair on your head to the short hair on your 
ass and kick you down the street!
%
Hank: Dale, you giblet-head, if you were gonna cheat, why'd you buy a frozen 
bass?
Dale: I had a coupon.
%
Bobby: Are you taking me to the vet?
%
Bobby: Hey I'm dressed like a football coach! You call that a block?!
%
Bobby: Dad, a man took pictures of me!
%
Hank:(finding Luanne in bed with Buckley) I'm in a crisis situation here, I 
gotta go find Bobby. You two take turns kicking each other's asses.
%
Dale Gribble: I thought we agreed to never discuss the horrors we saw on the 
killing fields of the Family Fun Center.
%
Cane Skretteberg: I don't care how many guys you held in the men's room, you 
still can't beat us!
%
Luanne: This is a great Xerox of you!
%
Bobby: Hey his scoop's bigger.
%
Pops: And there's doodies in there, right!?
%
Hank:(Shouting to Bobby stumbling around on the roof) It's a roof! Not American 
Bandstand!
%
Dale: When I need to correct Joseph, I tell him he's adopted.
%
Peggy Hill: Did a woman ruin the Supreme Court?
Hank Hill: Yes, and that woman's name was Earl Warren.
%
Bobby Hill: (about an athletic cup) This cup has holes in it. How am I supposed 
to drink out of this?
%
Doug the basketball coach: Bounce a ball in hockey?! Well that's a mandatory 
drug test right there!
%
Wrestling Coach: Shouldn't you be teaching the girls about their monthlies?
%
Connie: I wanna go to a party school! Yeah, Chico State!
%
Bobby: Some of the older ones have some breasts!
%
Bobby: Can I have some Gatorade now?
%
Clark Peters: Hey, Bobby, if you don't beat Connie, we don't know what we'll 
do. So you better beat her!
%
Bill: I'm all for lady's wrestling. Except when they do it in pudding. That's 
just demeaning to the human beings who make pudding.
%
Bobby Hill: (Stereotypical Yiddish accent) Blind he's gone now!
%
Hank:Where's my finger?
%
Bobby: Are you a war hero like my biological grandfather?
%
Bobby: That is so Arizona!
%
Gary Kazner: There's a uh, what are those things called?A semi, a demi, a 
coupla-dozen-wheelers.
%
Bill:I would never join a religion that restricted my diet. I don't want to get 
into heaven that way.
%
Hank: It seems the other eye compensates by shutting itself down. It's one of 
nature's wonders.
%
Hank: I'm not gonna be blind forever you know. And the second I see some ass 
I'm kicking it. Now no more making fun of my blindness.
%
Bill: Okey doke. Bring! Bring! Phone for you, Hank [takes off shoe and gives it 
to Hank]
%
[Everyone laughs but Hank]
%
Hank: The joke's on you, funny man.
%
[Hank throws the shoe out of the room. Ladybird chases after it while dragging 
Hank with her]
%
Luanne: OK Luanne, how do they get out of the closet? (gasps) Ohhh, No, that 
won't work.
Hank: (whispers) Jimmy the lock with a coathanger.
Luanne: What? I don't... I can't... hmmm, what?
Hank: (whispers) Jimmy the lock with a... (sighs) uh, (out loud) I'll save you, 
Manger Babies.
Luanne: You will?
Hank: Yes, uh, cause I'm the assistant manager of this movie theater. I sell 
popcorn and popcorn accessories and you are fired.
Luanne: (as the Manger Babies) We're free, we're free, whoo.
%
(audience claps)
Luanne: Thank you, assistant manager. Me-how can we ever repay you?
Hank: By never forgetting this lesson. Sneaking into the movies is wrong. As 
wrong as spilling juice on a new carpet.
Minister: Bravo, bravo.
Nancy: You know Luanne really shouldn't waste this kind of talent on church. If 
you want, I could show this tape to my boss at channel 84. He's always looking 
for quality children's programming and home videos of things blowing up.
Peggy: Well, Luanne really could use a boost right now, but I could not take 
advantage of our friendship like that, no.
Nancy: Oh, Peggy, honey. This is show business. That's what friends do.
%
Hank: Suffering is a part of every religion, Peggy. I mean ... look at what the 
Jews have been through, and you never hear them complaining.
%
Hank Hill: Hey Vickers, who do you like for the Super Bowl next year? The 
Doopie Loopies or the Shimmie Shammies? [Laughing]
Vickers: Okay, okay, very funny. But I like the Bills.
%
Buck Strickland: Got-dangit Hank, I'm having an infarction!
%
[Kahn panics when he finds out the "mi tad" condo is only a half condo and 
tricks Hank into using a spare key of his to break into the upper half.]
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Here's key. Lock little sticky. You got to rake it like 
there's no tomorrow.
Hank Hill: This is a car key.
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Yeah, you win new car. This big game show. Just rake it 
stupid.
%
[Dale is a poor lawyer.]
Judge: You will pay the condo manager 8,000 pesos.
Dale Gribble: But if the key does fit then you must acquit.
Judge: 10,000 pesos. Baliff, confiscate their identification.
%
[Hank and Dale are driving to the border with Kahn hiding in the trunk.]
Dale: Now just follow my lead and play it cool.
Hank: What if they find Kahn?
Dale: If I know my Mexican legal system, which I do, we'll get about 15 years 
with a starvation diet of moldy bread and warm water.
Hank: Distilled water?
Dale: (chuckling): No. And of course there is a total lack of toilet 
paper...and privacy.
Hank: Oh, God, I can't go while people watch.
Dale: Then let me do the talking.
%
[A border guard approaches them.]
Border Guard: Morning. Where are you gentlemen from?
Dale: (voice breaking): Arlen, Texas.
Border Guard: I've been to Arlen. Nice town.
Dale: Run!
%
[Dale runs out of the car mistakenly believing that they were caught. Kahn gets 
out of the trunk and runs away too. Hank chuckles nervously before running off 
as well.]
[Hank, Dale, and Kahn have just run away from the border guards.]
Hank: I think we lost them. We'll be okay.
Dale: Okay?! We're screwed!
Hank: No, we're American. We got to find a pay phone and hope Ross Perot's 800 
number's still working.
Kahn: Why you want to call that nut for? Border right there. Millions of people 
cross over every day. We can, too. No big deal.
Hank: Illegally? No! America is my country and I love her. I wouldn't enter her 
in any way that's unnatural.
Dale: We have no choice, Hank. The I.N.S. had their cameras trained on us. The 
border guards think we're smugglers. I'm too pretty to go to jail!
%
Hank: It says here I owe $40 and that can't be true. I always bring back my 
tapes. Look for yourself, I've returned The Great Santini 23 times.
Store Clerk: Okay, Hank Hill, June 23rd. Yeah, you rented and never returned 
Cuffs & Collars.
Hank: I've never even heard of that. Have you?
Peggy: Nuh-uh. Unless it's got the name Merchant, Ivory, or Billy Crystal above 
the title. I am not interested.
Bobby: Wait a minute. Wait a minute. They're buying me a movie for my birthday. 
That's why we're here, right?
Luanne: Really, Bobby. They haven't said anything.
Hank: Bobby, you ever heard of a movie called Cuffs & Collars?
Bobby: Ooh, I think that's the one with the two cops who don't get along, but 
then they do, but it's too late, cause he's dead, but not really.
Hank: So you've seen it?
Bobby: No.
Hank: How about you, Luanne.
Luanne: (nods no)
Bobby: Oh no. You're not getting a movie, Bobby (laughs). You are so smooth.
Hank: No, we didn't rent it. So if you could please erase the $40 and penalize 
yourself whatever you think is fair, we'll be on our way.
Store Clerk: I am sorry, but the computer won't let me erase anything until you 
either return the tape or pay the $40.
Hank: I told you I didn't rent the tape, now who is calling me a liar, you or 
the machine? 'Cause I wanna know whose ass to kick!
Store Clerk: I'm not calling you a liar, sir.
Hank: Fine. Now where's the ass on this thing?
Peggy: (sighs) I need a dryer, Hank. Just pay for the tape.
Hank: Absolutely not. I won't pay for someone else's screw up. Hell, I wouldn't 
be surprised if that tape was sitting on the shelf right now. Where would 
Cuff's & Collars be, Action Adventure, Action Comedy, Action Action?
Store Clerk: Make a left.
Hank: Okay. (realizes he's in the adult section and he rushes out) BWAHHHHH!
%
Boomhauer: Yeah, man, talkin 'bout that dang ol' Cuffs and Collars, man, like 
when they come over to clean that pool, man, it starts goin' 
wakka-wakka-wakka-wakka...
%
Dale Gribble: Computers don't make errors. What they do, they do on purpose. By 
now, your name and particulars have been fed into every laptop, desktop, 
mainframe, and supermarket scanner that collectively make up the global 
information conspiracy, otherwise known as... "the Beast".
%
Dale Gribble:Who's not a quitter? My dead friend Hank Hill or my new friend 
Rusty Shackleford?
%
Hank: (phone rings) Strickland Propane. Taste the meat, not the heat.
Matt: Hank?
Hank: Speaking.
Matt: How ya doin'? It's Matt.
Hank: Oh, hey, Matt. How ya been?
Matt: Pretty good. Pretty good.
Hank: Uh-huh.
Matt: So, how's, uh, Peggy?
Hank: Uh, she's fine, and how's uh, do I know you?
Matt: Hank, if you like Cuffs & Collars, you're gonna love Rugburn, Too and by 
Rugburn, Too I mean Rugburn also. Rugburn II isn't very good.
Hank: What? But, who is this?
Matt: You know, Matt, from Consenting Adults, the country's largest supply of 
mail order adult entertainment. How many can I put you down for?
Hank: Zero. God, please, watch your mouth. This is an interstate phone line. 
How did you get this number?
Matt: Not important. What is important is that we have a bigger selection and 
lower prices than Arlen Video.
Hank: What?! Arlen Video told you I rent pornography?! Uh, (Sees Buck 
Strickland and his co-workers and gasps), who plays the most hits? Y104! Heh, 
okay. Ah-heh, crazy morning zoo.
%
Luanne Platter Kleinschmidt: Mama got outta prison! ( runs to the garage)
Peggy Hill: (gasps and drops Ladybird's food dish in shock) Oh, I knew it! I 
just knew it! I told them medium security would not be enough to hold that 
woman!
Luanne Platter: No, she didn't escape, She was released! She's coming to visit 
on Saturday!
Hank Hill: Uh...she's coming here?
Luanne Platter: Oh, I can't wait to tell Daddy! Oh, we're gonna be a family 
again! (excitedly exits the garage)
Peggy Hill: I will tongue-kiss Bill before I let that tramp in my house!
Bobby Hill: Whoa.
%
Hank Hill: Yeah, I was all set to start a TV cabinet on Saturday, but it's 
gonna hafta wait a day. Luanne's mama is coming to visit.
Dale Gribble: (spits out his beer in shock) That woman is a menace to society.
Bill Dauterive: Well, I dunno, I never met the lady, but she did her time.
Boomhauer: I tell you what, ain't no dang ol' lady 'bout her man. She get all 
liquored up man, all comin' on strong an' pawin' me like a dang ol' animal, 
man. I tell her "no means no!"
Hank Hill: Yeah, Leanne is bad news I tell you what. Peggy's brother was all 
set to marry a pretty pharmacist gal until Leanne "entertained" at his bachelor 
party. [sighs] So he marries Leanne and after 18 years of drunken hell, she 
stabs him with a fork.
%
Dale Gribble: I never thought I'd say this, but, I don't think I can finish my 
beer.
%
Peggy Hill: Honey, marriage is about trust and she...well she betrayed him. It 
was like a knife in his heart when she stuck that fork in his back.
%
Leanne Platter: Oh, you have such a lovely home here. Of course if somebody 
turned on a fire hose it would all be ruined.
%
Hank Hill: Hey, Leanne. How's that job search coming along?
Leanne Platter: Not so good. My best reference just went in for chemical 
castration.
%
Bill is announcing his engagement to a drunk Leanne.
Bill Dauterive: We're engaged!
Leanne Platter: It was supposed to be a surprise! (punches Bill and burps) I 
need a smoke!
Bill Dauterive: This is the happiest day of my life!
%
Luanne is showing off her platinum blonde wig.
Peggy Hill: I will not have you running around all glammed up like Phyllis 
Diller!
Luanne Platter: You're not my mama! Mama is my mama!
Peggy Hill: Luanne, you are never gonna see her for who she is. Well, I am 
sorry, but I have not got time for pain. The next time that woman breaks your 
heart, I'm not gonna be waiting there to say "I told you so."
%
Luanne is begging a drunk Leanne to stop being provocative at Leanne's 
engagement party.
Luanne Platter: Mama, please!
Leanne Platter: Will you quit callin' me that?! I might be 34.
%
Leanne is about to stab Buckley with a fork when Peggy stops her.
Peggy Hill: Excuse me, ma'am, but that was my fork.
%
Dale Gribble: Poor Peggy, she's dead.
%
Peggy Hill: Leanne, whether you like the title or not you are this girl's 
mother. She has been waiting her whole life for just a shred of attention from 
you. But you don't even know how to return a fraction of the love you get from 
your child or even from your man. I hope someday you can live without alcohol, 
but until that day we can all live very nicely without you.
Leanne Platter: I kicked your brother's ass and I will kick yours too, sissy!
Peggy Hill: Well, there's one thing you didn't count on. My brother has got 
size 6 feet, but I don't! Ho-yeah! (throws Leanne to the ground with her feet 
and kicks her)
%
Leanne steals a truck and leaves.
Bill Dauterive: If she doesn't come back, that means she and I weren't meant to 
be and if she does come back, well then...then I'll call the police.
%
Hank:Bobby, if you weren't my son I'd hug you.
%
Witchard: Bobby, I need a soda!
Bobby: Yes, Mr. Witchard.
Witchard: Not that way! Just run across.
Bobby: But the track?!
Witchard: Don't back-talk the boss man! Ain't you ever cross the highway?! Run 
where there ain't any cars!
Bobby: They're going too fast!
Witchard: Do it you- you monkey boy! I'm the boss of you!
Hank: What the hell. BOBBY NO! What are you doing?
Bobby: I'm going to cross the track and bring Mr. Witchard a soda.
Hank: That's crazy! Why would you do something like that?
Bobby: I'm giving 110%, Dad.
Witchard: Go-to here, Go-to boy. I want a soda! Go-to now, you!
Hank: BWAAAAAHHH!!!
Announcer: There's a crazy man on the track!
Hank: BWAAAAAHHH!!!
Announcer: Oh, and there goes Gordon into the wall!
Pit crew guy: You're up!
Dale and Bill: Boomhauer, Boomhauer, Boomhauer, Yeah!
%
(Hank panting)
Witchard: Ah! (laughing) You can't get me!
Hank: BWAAAAAHHH!!! (breaks the caged fence and chases after Witchard)
Witchard: (screams)
%
Bobby Hill: There's some milk in the fridge that is about to go bad....and 
there it goes.
%
Bobby Hill: There are 96 ridges on every checker...except this one.
%
Unidentified feminist singer:
I met a guy in my boxing class
and I slept with him before I kicked his ass!
%
Buckley: Sir, there's no yelling in the propane department. Some of these gases 
are extremely valublilous.
%
Boomhauer: Hey man, is this dang ol' 911? Hey listen, there's a dang ol' fire 
in here, and dang ol' Mega-Lo-Mart went boom!
911 Operator: Sir, you are going to have to speak a lot more slowly.
Boomhauer: Dang... ol'... Mega-Lo-Mart... done git went got it, and dang ol' 
boom!
%
Peggy: HAAAAAANNNNNKKKK!
Bill: CHUUUUUCCCCCKKK!
Mega Lo Mart Employee: Buckley and Luanne are in there!
%
Hank: MEGA-LO-MART?! WELL WHY DON'T YOU JUST GO TO HELL AND WORK FOR THE DEVIL?!
Luanne: Good thing I don't have dangerous brain powers, or right now you'd be 
in a thousand little pieces!
%
Dale talking to an investigator at the scene.
Dale Gribble: Find the body yet, Quincy?
Investigator: We have some remains that we're analyzing, you needn't concern 
yourself.
Dale Gribble: Oh, I needn't, shouldn't I? And maybe I should not know that all 
Mega Lo Mart employees have a five thousand dollar insurance policy.
Investigator: That's nonsense. This is a very straightforward investigation.
Dale Gribble: Heh, that's what they want you to think.
Investigator: Sir, we are they.
%
[Dale twitches surprised and runs away]
Luanne Platter: (reference a picture of Bobby, in his underwear, grabbing a 
cookie off the kitchen table while standing up to speak at Buckley's funeral) 
This is what a starving Irish child looks like! Fight the occupation! Fight the 
Oc-cu-pa-tion!
%
Bobby: (With his pants pulled up, in heavy Yiddish accent) "What are you 
talkin' about?"
%
Peggy is trying to think of new musings for the local newspaper.
Peggy Hill: Mix pineapple juice and club soda, and you've got yourself a big 
bucket of crap.
%
From Peggy's newspaper article.
Peggy Hill: You hear the expression "Lie like a dog" so much it is almost a 
cliché.
%
Peggy Hill: Well, well, well Jo-hon Redcorn.
John Redcorn: Oh, Peggy. Nancy's headache's very severe this morning, um... 
must be the pollen.
Peggy Hill: Well, well, well.
John Redcorn: Well.
Peggy Hill: Jo-hon Redcorn.
John Redcorn: Pe-eggy Hill.
%
Cotton Hill: Tilly! Did you make this Stuffin'? 'CAUSE IT TASTES LIKE GARBAGE!
Hank Hill: (in a worried tone): Uh, Dad?
Cotton Hill: Did I ever tell you about the time she tried to poison me with a 
baked Chicken?
Tilly Hill: (sighs) It was Chicken Almondine.
Cotton Hill: IT WAS CYANIDE, WOMAN!
Hank Hill: (exasperated) Dad, could you please show Mom some respect while 
Bobby's in the room?
Cotton Hill: You heard him, Bobby. Leave the room! (Bobby gets up to leave the 
room)
Hank Hill: (frustrated) Sit down.
Bobby Hill: Grandpa, could you at least respect Grandmom until we get to 
dessert?
Cotton Hill: Didi's your Grandmom too, Bobby..... Your pretty Grandmom! 
'Course, bad as Tilly was in the Kitchen, she was even worse in the Bedroom! 
(Brief silence) I Said.... The Woman was lousy in the sack.
%
(Long silence)
Bill Dauterive: (tapping glass with knife then getting up to propose a toast) 
To the Stuffing! Might taste like Garbage, but it sure fills you up!
%
Cotton Hill: I'm goin' down to the corn dog shack to watch the girlies make 
lem-o-nade.
%
Bill: (in falsetto voice) Why do you keep calling me "Bill?"
%
Hank walks in the room with a food dish.
Dale Gribble: Whatd'ya got under the foil, Mr. Party Pooper, some party poop?
%
Hank Hill: "Heck, I thought I'd go ahead and sharpen all the axes."
Dale Gribble: (singing) "Hank's a lumberjack and he's OK..."
%
[Boomhauer is telling the Chief what happened in his POV, everyone except him 
is talking Boomhauer-style]
Dale Gribble: Yeah, man, I tell you what, man, dang ol' detector, man, 
government take away freedom of smoke, talkin' 'bout yo, man.
Hank Hill: Yeah, man, I tell you what, man, dang ol' boy ain't right, man, 
talkin' 'bout kick your ass, man.
Boomhauer: (speaking clearly) For God's sakes, Hank, act like an adult, man. 
And keep it down, guys, will you? I am trying to get through an article on 
vintage Camaros, and I've been on the same dang page for twenty minutes.
Bill: Dang ol' pretty pretty pizza, man, I tell you what.
%
Heck Dorland: "I got bad news, men. Chet Elderson died. Natural causes." (Bill 
farts while his butt is hanging out the top of the fire pole) "Oh, for cryin' 
out loud!"
%
[Bill has just been hit in the face with a hot Frito pie]
Bill Dauterive: My face hurts.
Hank Hill: And it'll match your ass when I'm done kicking it!
%
Hank Hill: Bobby, I didn't think I'd ever need to tell you this, but I would be 
a bad parent if I didn't. Soccer was invented by European ladies to keep them 
busy while their husbands did the cooking.
Bobby Hill: Why do you hate what you don't understand?
Hank Hill: I don't hate you Bobby!
Bobby Hill: I was talking about soccer.
Hank Hill: Oh yeah, I hate soccer.
%
Coach Sauers: You little pantywads think you're ready to play the Wolves again? 
The Wolves eat razorblades for breakfast! Run, you bunch of pudgy-butted 
softies! Run, with your fancy sneakers, with pumps, valves and lights on the 
back that can set off a seizure! But what do you care? I ran around the world 
in a pair of Chuck Taylors for the love of pete! Take a salt tablet.
%
[Bobby is doing push-ups on the muddy grass.]
Bobby: Coach, I think I swallowed too much mud.
Coach Sauers: Take a salt tablet.
%
Coach Sauers: I'm gonna ride you guys so hard your gonna wish you were all 
dead! I'm gonna chew ya up spit ya out take a big dump on top of that and then 
i'm gonna get tough! LETS ROLLLLLLL EM OUT!
%
Hank Hill: Boys, the Welton Wolves have already left their mark on this bridge. 
Now, what does a cougar do when a wolf comes into his neck of the woods?
Bobby Hill: Beats him in football?
Hank Hill: Yeah, that's where I was gonna end up.
%
Hank Hill: God bless America on three...One...two...three
Team & Hank Hill: Gooooooood bless America!
Coach Sauers: Hey, butter ball, drag the body back!
%
Hank Hill: Soccer was invented by european housewives as a way to keep busy 
while their husbands did the cooking
%
Peggy Hill (To a group of soccer moms): If we were in Canada you ladies would 
be snooty Quebecoise.
%
Kahn sees the fake wedding between Luanne and Bobby and believes it is real.
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Minh, come quick! It's finally happening! Bobby 
Hillbilly marrying hillbilly cousin. You owe me five dollars. In your face!
%
Luanne Platter Kleinschmidt: Uncle Hank! Bobby's trying to get out of marrying 
me!
Hank Hill: Bobby, you cut that out!
Bobby: "Dad! I've gotten Luanne pregnant!"
%
Bobby: [Bobby is presenting Jesus' miracles in the form of a magic show] Now, 
for my next trick, I'm gonna need a large wooden cross and a couple of 
volunteers...
Hank & Peggy: NOOOOOOOOOOOOO!!!!!
%
Bobby Hill: I've got gout!
%
Dale: "I killed eight gophers last year and a purebred Tennessee walking horse 
that was looking at me funny."
%
Dale Gribble: Boil up some Mountain Dew; it's gonna be a long night.
%
Dale Gribble: Hank, you were right! The Cubans have my mower!
%
Dale Gribble: What time is it, 3 AM, 4 AM?
Nancy Gribble: It's six.
Dale Gribble: AM?!
Nancy Gribble: No.
Dale Gribble: Oh. Is dinner ready?
%
Dale Gribble: They wanted to see me wet my pants from fear... but they're too 
late!
%
Hank Hill: You are officially the coolest.
%
Hank tells Dale to come down from a clock tower before someone gets hurt.
Dale Gribble: Too late, I killed Shackleford! No...wait, correction, 
Shackleford wants a pizza.
%
Nancy Gribble: Hey, whatever turns you on, that's what I always say.
%
Bobby Hill: I'd like a one-way ticket to Mexico por favor. That means 'today.'
%
Hank Hill: What's that smell?
%
Cotton Hill: Look for the man with the terrible smell!
%
Cotton Hill: I'm an old man. Everybody already hates me. But Bobby is just a 
child; he has his whole life ahead of him. ... If I could take a bullet for my 
grandson, I would. Just not in the face; that's how I make my livings.
%
Cotton Hill: Ah leave it to a woman to turn god's house into a love shack.
%
Dale: (After a trampoline falls on his foot) "Aah! This is a sign that we have 
been playing God with Buckley's trampoline and now God is playing God with us, 
and He's a whole lot better at it. I refuse to touch this portal to hell!"
%
[Hank is hanging around Buckley's trampoline. Dale peeks out his window and 
yells:]
Dale: Run, Hank! Portal to Hell!
[Dale quickly closes his curtains.]
%
[Luanne is waiting for Buckley by the trampoline, listening to "Angel Flying 
Too Close to the Ground," and starts to cry. Peggy comes out and puts her hand 
on Luanne's shoulder.]
Luanne: Where is he? Buckley always did this to me. One time we were supposed 
to go see Color Me Badd and he never showed up. I was looking forward to that 
concert all week and when I told him, he just said "chicken beak." [pause] He 
better not be guardianin' some other girl. Maybe I should drop out of beauty 
school.
Peggy: What? Luanne, you have wanted to go to beauty school since you were six. 
You have wanted to graduate beauty school since you were twelve. If you give up 
on school, honey, you are giving up on your dreams. "Education is the sleeping 
pill that makes dreams happen." - Peggy Hill.
%
[Buckley has returned one final time and Luanne sits with him on the 
trampoline.]
Buckley: I just wanted to say I'm sorry I bailed out of the car.
Luanne: I knew you weren't really a jerk.
Buckley: Yeah. Well, I gotta go. Jesus is having a party tonight. It's gonna 
rock.
Luanne: There will probably be a lot of people there. But if you see Jesus, 
tell him I said thanks. [pause] Goodbye Buckley.
Buckley: Um, before I go - could I have one last kiss?
[Luanne nods. Buckley kisses her hard and begins to feel her sides; his wings 
flutter before she breaks away.]
Luanne: No, that part's over.
Buckley: Why?
Luanne: Chicken thigh.
%
Didi is handed G.H., the baby to which she just finishing giving birth.
Didi Hill: What's his name?
%
Hank Hill: Dad, this isn't right. If you call him Good Hank, it makes it sound 
like I'm Bad Hank.
Cotton Hill: Well, you burnt my burgers, didn't you, B.H.?
%
Bill: (Trying to put on his old football helmet) Hank, how did my head get so 
fat?
%
Carl Moss: We don't have money for all these fancy teaching aides... like wood.
Hank Hill: You know, the Carl Moss I knew wouldn'-
Carl Moss: Give it a rest, Hank. All parents care about these days is 
zero-tolerance drug policies and literacy. "Why can't Johnny read?" "Why can't 
Johnny read?" God, that gets old.
Hank: But Carl, shop is the foundation of all learning. And I'll tell you what, 
a youngster with a tool in both hands has no hands left to do drugs.
Carl Moss: (exasperated) They'll just put the tools down if they want to do the 
drugs bad enough.
%
Hank: Using a saw for a weapon makes about as much sense as using a gun to cut 
a two-by-four. That's how my dad built my treehouse... how he cleaned it, too.
%
(Hank has stated that he won't be able to continue teaching shop)
Hank: But that shouldn't stop you from pursuing your own dreams of wood, 
plywood, pressed fiberboard, and, if you've got the talent, metal! Y'see, shop 
doesn't have to happen in any special place - as long as it's well lit, and the 
outlets are grounded. Because shop is bigger than any classroom, or garage, or 
stupid policy that makes tools illegal - it's in our hearts.
%
Connie is trying to explain her problem to Hank
Connie: Well, um, you see, uhh...
Hank: What?
%
Connie writes something on paper and hands it to Hank
Hank: (Reading the note) 'Mr. Hill, I just got my first period.' Bwaaaaah!
%
Peggy: 'Hank do you want to be in Charge?'
Hank: 'No.'
%
[After viewing Bill's huge septic tank]
Hank: It's a shame we have to put her in the ground.
%
Dale: I am the hoe master! Watch me hoe! [nearly runs over Hank and Bill and 
damages Bill's wall]
%
[Dale and Bill are secretly following Hank and Hal to the sporting goods store.]
Dale: (Talking into tape recorder) 10:15. Hank picks up Hal.
Bill: What?
%
[Dale rewinds tape recorder and plays it next to Bill's ear.]
Dale: (On tape recorder) 10:15. Hank picks up Hal.
Bill: (On tape recorder) What?
Dale: I said, "10:15, Hank picks up Hal!"
%
Hank: Bobby, you name a pet, you name a guitar, but you do not name a filthy 
animal!
%
Dale: [while standing on a tree branch] This...isn't...over. So long, suckers! 
[caws like a bird]
%
[He jumps off and falls flat on his face.]
Dale: [while laying face down in the dirt] Hank, I can see your house from up 
here.
%
Dale enters his basement and sees that his hamster has eaten all of his food 
stores.
Dale Gribble: How could you do this to me Puff-puff
%
Dale Gribble: My gerbil screwed me!
%
Chappy: I live in a shack, I poop in an outhouse, I eat what I kill.
Hank Hill: There isn't a Mrs. Chappy, is there Chappy?
%
Luanne Platter: (sighs) Mr. Strickland's wife is beautiful.
Hank Hill: That's NOT his wife. That's Debbie from work. Pretty girl like that 
should have been able to get a date.
Peggy gives Hank a look as if he has no clue about his boss' reputation
%
Hank Hill: The "S" stands for service. The "T" is for trust. (Mr. Strickland 
and Debbie make out) "R" is for reliability. (doors are heard opening and 
closing) Now the "I", that stands for...
Woman's voice{offscreen}: Jackass!
Camera shows that Elizabeth "Miz Liz" Strickland has entered the banquet
Jerry Sandoval{offscreen}: Oh ho, it is Miz Liz! This ought to be good!
Hank Hill: No, heh, heh. It's for integrity. That's not even the right letter.
Mr. Strickland: Now, now Miz Liz. We're in public.
Miz Liz: YOU ARE IN PUBLIC WITH THIS LITTLE BIMBO...IN FRONT OF HALF OUR 
CHRISTMAS CARD LIST! (notices Debbie's earrings) Are those my mother's 
earrings?!
Hank Hill: "C" is for compassion....
Miz Liz: I WANT YOU OUT OF THE HOUSE!!
Mr. Strickland: But Miz L...
Miz Liz: AND OUT OF THE LAKE HOUSE!!
Mr. Strickland: The lake house?
Miz Liz: Please forgive me for stealing your thunder Hank. Please continue.
Miz Liz departs banquet hall
Hank Hill: Okay now, where was I?
off-screen voice (possibly Thatherton): How about "D" for done?!
%
Bobby Hill:: Dad! Dad, the police are lookin' for you!
Hank Hill: (whispering to himself) Oh, god! Debbie's hippie roommate turned me 
in for smokin' narcotics!
Peggy Hill: Haaaank!
Buck Strickland:I like to hump, I like to eat, and I don't like to drive.
Hank: I am inducing vomiting!
%
Hank: How long does it take Debbie to throw in a load of laundry? I really need 
to talk to her.
Debbie's roommate: She should be right up. Debbie said you were gonna... HEY!
Hank: No, we were not. It was a trick.
Debbie's roommate: Is $300 too much for a Hot Wheels VW Purple Evil Weevil?
Hank: (sighs) Yeah, I could use one too.
Debbie's roommate: Damn, the ebay auction closed. I lost my weevil.
Hank: Dang it. Could I get a light off yours? Huh, that's a funny looking 
cigarette. You roll it yourself?
Debbie's roommate: Yeah.
Hank: You got a weak flame on this thing. (Hank breathes it and coughs) This 
isn't one of them clove cigarettes, is it?
Debbie's roommate: No man. That's the chronic, from Mexico.
Hank: Huh, damn NAFTA. It's clearly an inferior tobacco.
Debbie's roommate: So, does your wife party too?
Hank: Party? Uh, we throw a party for Fourth of July and Labor Day.
Debbie's roommate: No, I mean party, you know. Get high. Get stoned.
Hank: BWAHHHHHHH!
%
Luanne: My class was cancelled and the library was closed. I love college.
%
Dale is talking to his pet turtle.
Dale Gribble: C'mon, I'm not leaving without my kiss. I can wait.... I can 
destroy you.
%
(Reading math word problem)
Bobby: Mrs. Johnson's bag has six puppies. Mr. Peterson's bag has minus four 
puppies...
%
Joseph is crouched down, his face is pressed against the door handle.
Joseph: Why don't your doors have keyholes?
Bobby: You're really starting to creep me out, now go home!
%
Bobby shoves Joseph, who hits the door and makes a noise and runs away. The 
door opens. Bobby gasps.
Luanne: Bobby, it's perfectly natural to want to see a woman naked, but I am 
your cousin. Now, the first time was an accident, but if I catch you again, you 
are going to hell.
%
Bobby sees Joseph outside in the bushes.
Bobby: Are you crazy? We're going to get caught. I could go to hell!
Joseph: I can't help myself. I've got a monkey on my back and it wants to see 
Luanne naked!
%
Dale Gribble: Hey you, crazy guy. I'll give you a smoke if you trade clothes 
with me.
%
Dale Gribble: Infiltration of mental hospital complete. Proceed to phase two; 
exfiltration of mental hospital.
%
Dale tries to open a locked door.
Dale Gribble: Apparently this door has some kind of anti-opening device.
%
Dale Gribble: ...which is why so many people are suddenly allergic to peanuts. 
The peanuts are emitting toxins as an evolutionary defense mechanism. They're 
tired of being eaten, and now they're fighting back.
Psychiatrist: I see.
Dale Gribble: Anyhoo, I just stopped by to pick up my buddy Boomhauer. You see, 
we're both in here by mistake. Now I can't vouch for Boomhauer, but I am most 
definitely not crazy.
Psychiatrist: Go on.
Dale Gribble: Did you just say, "Go Mom"? Now who's the crazy one?
%
Bill: (In a self-help class in a mental hospital) It's just that in the alley, 
no one cares what I have to say, but here, I feel heard and accepted and dare I 
say... loved?
%
Dale: We gotta get out of here. The smoking breaks are too short, the food is 
good at best and the anti-depressants are making my mouth dry and happy.
%
Bill raises his hand.
Bill: (shouting) Can I get some glitter please?
Bill: Why don't we just call Hank?
Dale: No. Hank must never know we were in here. Our society stigmatizes the 
mentally ill... and rightfully so, these people are nuts!
%
Hank: (Hank realizes he's all alone and sighs. Then he sees Khan starting to 
build a fence.) Hey Khan. I thought I heard someone mixing concrete.
Khan: Oh, that's right. I'm building fence. Big fence. Eight feet tall between 
your house and my house.
Hank: Eight feet huh? Yeah, you see Khan, in this neighborhood, side fences 
have to be 5'6 or under. It's not in the code or anything, it's just something 
I'm trying to enforce.
Khan: You really want to help me, Hank Hill? You keep your dirty little boy's 
hands off my innocent genius daughter!
Hank: Now what's that supposed to mean?
Khan: Last night, I catch Bobby half-naked in Connie's room!
Hank: Bobby?!
Khan: The truth about your little boy not so pretty after all, is it, Hank 
Hill?! He girl-crazy sex-fiend!
Hank: Well, that boy's gonna get a talking to, I tell ya what! (Hank walks away 
and secretly laughs) Whew.
%
Luanne Platter: Aunt Peggy, Mister Kahn saw me naked!
Joseph: (driving by on his bike) Oh man!
%
Dale Gribble: The only thing your roommates (ie: enemies) will understand is 
fear (ie: psychological warfare (ie: dirty tricks)). It worked for Dick Nixon. 
For example, get ahold of some goat's blood. Taint that blood. Then when your 
roommates need blood, give them the tainted goat's blood. It's a perfect plan.
Luanne: I don't want to hurt anyone... I just want them to do the dishes.
Dale Gribble: Oh, well in that case stack the dishes in the shower. That's the 
way Nancy gets me to do them.
%
Hank: So you found yourself a project. Do you get the same, uh, high I get from 
lawn care?
%
[Peggy and Hank are practicing how to like Kahn and Mihn]
Peggy: Let's practice. I'll be Kahn. [clears throat] You are a dumb redneck!
Hank: That sounds more like Mihn.
Peggy: [still imitating Kahn] Well, leave my wife out of this hillbilly!
Hank: [chuckles] He, he. I wish they'd move.
%
[Dale's finger is stuck in Bill's beer can]
Dale: "Let go of my finger!"
Bill: "You let go of my beer!"
Dale: "So help me, Bill don't mess with my trigger finger!"
Bill: "Oh, what are you going to do, shoot me with my beer? I don't think so!"
%
Peggy sees a bumper sticker reading; 'My child is an honor roll student.'
Peggy Hill: Oh yeah? Well my child is God to billions of Asians!
%
Joe Jack:"Baby did a bad, bad thing."
%
Bobby Hilll: "..Not like butane and those other bastard gasses."
%
[Hank can't take Dale, Bill, or Boomhauer to a restaurant because Peggy wants 
it to be only a couples night out. The single trio sigh, but Dale realizes he 
has a wife]
Dale: Wait a minute. I have a wife; We're a couple! [starts doing a martial 
dance while singing] I get a free meal! I get a free meal! [to Hank] He, Ha.
%
[Hank sighs]
Dale Gribble: Wait a minute. Every time I leave, you call John Redcorn. I know 
what's going on here. Your headaches are a desperate bid for my attention. But 
what do I do? I pawn you off on some Indian healer so I can have my Dale time 
at the gun club, or breeding show turtles, or on the Internet investigating 
unexplained phenomenonon. God, I am so selfish!
%
Dale: [while forming a line while skating with Nancy] Love train! Woo, woo!
%
Dale: Aw, I've been at John Redc- uh, the gun club ... playing Russian Roulette.
Nancy: Did you win?
Dale: You're not familiar with the game, are you?
Nancy: No...
Dale: Yeah, I won.
%
Hank installs a low-flow toilet and flushes twice.
Hank Hill: Still?
%
Hank's lawn dies due to a drought and Bobby tries to help.
Bobby Hill: Dad! I just took a thirty second shower and I'm gonna dry myself 
off on the lawn!
%
Kahn attempts to explain why his lawn is so green during a severe drought.
Kahn Souphanousinphone: I use secret Asian watering technique! I could spit in 
a thimble and water Central Park.
%
Hank is offered low flow toilets from water meter reader guy.
Hank Hill: Well, I don't know. My toilets have given 15 years of dependable 
service. I'm not one of those guys who turns 40 and runs out and buys fancy new 
toilets.
%
Hank Hill:..But, unfortunately, in the real world, where things don't flush 
like they do in the movies...
%
Town Hall
Hank: Where do I register to run for the zoning board?
Bureaucrat: Fill out this form.
Hank fills out form and submits it
Hank: When will the election be?
Bureaucrat: There is no election. There has been a vacancy on the zoning board 
for the past three years. The seat is yours.
Bobby: We won!
Hank: No Bobby, Arlen won.
%
Dale: "That makes a whole lot of sense... A whole lot of nonsense!"
%
Kahn: [Answering a knock at the door] Use doorbell, you idiot. [Kahn opens the 
door and sees Joseph standing there] Connie, it's for you!
Connie: If it's Bobby, slam the door in his face!
Kahn: Oh, I wish it was, so I could!
%
Minh: Boy, that little hillbilly pack quite a wallop. You want some neproxin?
Joesph: No, I'm okay.
Minh: How did tall, dark, and handsome get butt-kicked by short, fat, and 
redneck?
Joesph: [sighs and stares at Minh and kisses her]
Connie: Joseph? [Minh is laughing] What's going on?
Minh: Oh, you so cute. Kahn gonna get a big kick out of this.
Connie: Joseph? How could you? [throws a towel at him and runs away]
Joesph: Sorry, I just... I thought you liked me.
Minh: Oh yeah. You rock my world [laughs]
%
Didi Hill: Sorry I'm late; I had to take three buses to get here: one to get 
here, one to go back and get G.H., and one to get here.
%
[Hank and Peggy are looking at all the children at the Santa's Village at 
Bill's house.]
Peggy: Rented snow machines, all these lights it's like a carnival. I wonder 
how Jesus feels about this.
Hank: It's Christmas and Bill's happy. I'll tell you how Jesus feels great.
%
[The Hills are trying to drive through the congested traffic on their street, 
when Dale knocks on Hank's window.]
Dale: Valet parking is five dollars. Valet of the Dale's is not responsible for 
lost or stolen articles.
Hank: Dale, I'm just going to park in my driveway.
Dale: That lot's full, but Bill says I can put overflow parking poolside at 
Luanne's house. :[yells to Octavio, off-screen]
%
Octavio! La bomba le automobilo. No scratcho. Comprende?
[Wally is looking into Luanne's yard over Bill's fence.]
Wally: Nice pool. What say we jump in and see what floats?
Luanne: Just keep your beer cans off of my lawn. And quit trying to read my 
t-shirt.
[Hank approaches Wally.]
Wally: You lose something over here?
Hank: I am making a citizen's arrest for trespassing.
Wally: I don't think so.
Hank: Believe me, I've done it before.
[Wally holds up Bill's house key.]
Hank: Well, how did you get Bill's key chain? Okay, you're under arrest for 
theft, too.
Wally: He gave it to me. Now, get off our property, or I'll citizen arrest you.
Hank: Damn it, when Bill comes home...
Wally: [mockingly] "Weh Beh guh hum..."
Hank: What the hell are you doing?
Wally: "Whu de huh ur da doon?"
[Hank storms off as Wally's friends laugh.]
%
[Bobby, Connie, and Joseph walk up to Wally.]
Wally: I believe you guys are first-time callers, so I'm only going to charge 
you a buck.
Bobby: For what?
Wally: Beer.
Connie: We'd better go.
Bobby: Why? Because beer's not TV-14? Set me up, my man.
[Wally hands Bobby a 40 ounce bottle of Alamo beer. Bobby is hesitant to take 
it.]:
Wally: What's the matter? 40 ounces for a buck is a good deal.
Bobby: Oh, yeah. I just usually drink 30 ouncers, but hey, it's the weekend.
[Moments later, The kids are in the bounce house, groaning drunkenly.]
Bobby: [huddling up against Connie] Come here. Just think, Connie girl, when 
we're all grown-ups and marrieds, we'll get to do this every night.
Connie: Yeah, I want a house just like this with soft floors and plastic 
windows.
Joseph: [staring at the ceiling] Look at the stars. There's... so many of them.
Bobby: Yeah.
Connie: Cool.
Wally: You know the best way to sober up? Bounce around a lot get it out of 
your system.
[The kids try to stand up, but are too drunk to do so. They start laughing as 
Hank finds them.]
Hank: Bobby?
Bobby: Hey, Dad! I like beer! [immediately turns around and vomits.]
%
Bill: "Can't a man get his own Ranger Dog?"
%
Hank: I'm gonna kick your asses!
%
Dale: Why is it always about asses with you, Hank?
%
[Dale has hired Octavio to destroy a puppet that frightens him. Octavio spies 
on Hank and Bobby while Dale spies on Octavio.]:
%
Octavio: (Into a tape recorder) 11:15 A.M.: The man and the boy and the puppet 
leave the house.
%
Dale: (Into a tape recorder) 11:16: Octavio speaks into tape recorder, thus 
leaving crucial evidence, stupid idiot! Octavio must be gotten rid of!
[Dale opens his glovebox and moves a pistol aside. Then he takes out a notepad 
and begins to write.]
Dale: Dear Octavio, this is the hardest letter I've ever had to write...
Dale: (After inhaling chloroform) You wouldn't hit an unconscious ma- (passes 
out)
%
Hank Hill: The only woman I'm pimping from now on is Sweet Lady Propane. And 
I'm tricking her out all over this town.
%
[Trying to act like a pimp while confronting one.]
Hank Hill: Alright, man, get outta that Jalopy and let's talk some bui'ness!
%
Hank Hill: I am the mack daddy of Heimlich County, I play it straight up, yo. 
You get the hell outta my 'hood!
%
Hank Hill: You get out... your hooker stuff... of my house!
%
[Realizing the pimp realated stuff going on]
Hank Hill: Son of a... BWAAH!!
%
Dale: "Turbines!" (NOTE: He is in a air vent filled with roaches, he promptly 
rotates and kills several)
%
A sleeping Hank is awakened by a telephone call at home.
Hank Hill: Uhh...Strickland Propane, taste the...I mean, hello?
%
Luanne Platter: Uncle Hank, I quit being a virgin the first time I had sex.
%
Hank Hill: Peggy...I can see your whatnots.
%
[Hank learns that Peggy had sex with another man before she got married.]
Hank: Bwaaah!!!
Peggy: He's gay now, if that makes you feel better.
Hank: BWAAAAAAAAAH!!!
Peggy: Of course it doesn't.
%
Boomhauer: (To Bobby) "Hey man, your daddy quotes me? Hey man, maybe we'll stay 
mad at Hank for just one week." (Versus three)
%
Hank: Why couldn't it have been me and Boomhauer that did something horrible to 
you guys?
Bill: 'Cause Boomhauer's a saint.
%
Dr. Tate : Mr. Hill, you have no ass.
%
Hank: You want me to wear a fake hiney?
%
Dr. Tate: Mr. Hill, are your shoes fake feet?
%
Cotton Hill: Good God, Hank. Yer wearin' butt boobies!
%
Diminished Glutes Support Group: [Chanting at race]: We're here! No rear! Get 
used to it!
%
Dale: (When Dale's Porta Potti collapses while Hanks's in it) "He's a squatter!"
%
Senior#1: (Enters the boys' bathroom with his friends while Bobby is washing 
his hands) "Ha. Hey, Fresh meat, This is the seniors bathroom. I'm gonna shove 
your head in the toilet".
%
Bobby: That's my purse! I don't know you!
%
[Bobby talks about his new penchant for kicking people in the groin.]
Bobby: Hey, I didn't go looking for trouble. Trouble came-a-knockin' and Bobby 
Hill's foot answered the door.
%
Bill: I wish I had a son to kick me in the nuts.
%
[Dale suddenly kicks Bill in the groin]
Dale: Be careful what you wish for.
%
Bobby: I kicked my dad in the crotch.
Connie: You kicked your father? We all have those feelings, Bobby. But, we 
never act on them.
Kahn: (Talking to Bobby) I heard what you did to Chane Wassonasong  
unforgivable! But then I hear what you did to your father  very funny. So I'm 
conflicted.
%
Peggy: Uh-huh, That's right, Bobby. I believe you will find that I have no 
testicles. Where's your secret weapon now, huh?
Kahn: She bluffing! Finish her!
%
Bobby: Um, alright guys. The girls aren't here, you don't have to pretend to be 
tough. Oh! [Chane pushes him to the ground] Come on. Uh, I live next door. All 
I have to do is scream and my dad will be on you like flies on pie.
Chane Wassonasong: If you eat some dirt, then maybe I'll leave you alone.
Bobby: But, I don't want to eat any dirt. Well, maybe just a little. (He 
pretends to eat dirt) Yum, that's good dirt.
Chane Wassonasong: You didn't eat any.
Bobby: DAD! DAD!
%
Bobby: I'm sorry, Mom. It was a reflex. [Peggy jumps on him, then noogies him] 
Mom, okay! I said I was sorry! [groaning]
%
Dale Gribble: If you want to elect me, Dale Gribble, president of the Gun Club, 
running on the Save-Your-Sorry-Ass platform, say "aye."
%
Dale Gribble: (holding a plate of macaroons, small macaroons on one side, large 
macaroons on the other side) Macaroon? I've got entrance wound size, and exit 
wound size. (The small macaroons are called "entrance wound size", and the 
large macaroons are called "exit wound size".)
%
Dale: "Pocket sand!" (tosses sand in the eyes of his attacker)
%
Hank, Boomhaur, and Bill are tied to chairs when Hank decided to try and call 
for help using his nose to poke the phone on the front of Boomhauer's belt. 
When Mad Dog walks in, he sees it from an unfortunate angle.
Mad Dog
Oh my god, what the hell are you doing?!
Hank Hill: Nothing! I swear! I was just calling for help!
%
Dale is on the phone with Hank who has been kidnapped.
Bobby Hill: Is that my dad [on the phone]? Ask him if he's gonna be late if I 
can have his pork chop.
Dale Gribble: Bobby, you'll be eating your father's pork chop every night for 
the rest of your life. Wait. That's the saddest thing I've ever heard. 
Retraction! Bobby, you will not be having your father's pork chop tonight, or 
any other night! You hear me Hank?! Bobby's not eating your pork chop!
%
Peggy is giving her testimony to a Mexican court, in Spanish.
Peggy Hill: (subtitled): Your honor, I can tell you are a reasonable horse. I 
am very pregnant because of what happened with Lupe. She ate my bus accident 
and all I wanted was to make Lupe into a book. I have too many good anuses 
ahead of me to spend my life in a cigar factory.
%
Hank is trying to choose a Christmas ornament.
Hank Hill: How about this one?
Cotton Hill: Peace!? I bet you would like that! Why don't you get one with a 
flag-burnin' on it? Besides, we're a Joy family.
%
Hank Hill: Dad, it's Jesus peace, not Hippie peace...
%
Didi Hill: I'm lucky. Cotton is so easy to shop for. Either he likes what I get 
him, and he's happy, or he hates it, and he shoots it, and he's happy.
%
Bobby: "I'm sweet on you, Connie! I'm your little candy man!"
Bobby: (When Connie referred to Bobby as 'just a friend) "Don't use the 'f' 
word on me, not me; This is your cuddle monster talking."
Stuart Dooley: (To Bobby) "You shot her in the eye."
Connie: "Oh, gross! You licked it!" (runs off, Joseph puts down his drink)
Joseph: (to Bobby) "What are you doing? You're ruining my party." (takes 
Bobby's toy bow)
Bobby: (to Joseph) "What?! You wouldn't even be having this party if it wasn't 
for me. You'd just be sitting alone going, 'Dude, like, eh... I'm so bleah."
Joseph: "Come on. Get..." (tries to push Bobby out)
Bobby: "Watch it. You're pulling off the wings! Let go! I'm not leaving! I am 
not leaving unless Connie leaves with me." (Bobby now gets in, trying to hold 
his grip onto the couch.)
Joseph:(as he and the boys grab Bobby) "Come on. One, two, three. Get him. Get 
him." (Clark Peters lifts his fingers, carry him, and throw him over the fence, 
cheering. Bobby grunts)
%
Dale: Falcon, bring us back a vole. Sh-sh-sha!
%
[The falcon immediately attacks Bill.]
Bill: AAAAAAAAAAAHHHH!! It bites!
%
[Bill runs off.]
Dale: ...so Bill's a vole.
%
[Kahn tries to drive his SUV in his garage, but it's to big to fit inside.]
Hank: Where are you going to keep it, smart guy? It doesn't even fit inside 
your garage.
Kahn: Uh, Maybe I keep garage inside SUV! (laughs) Kiss my ass!
%
Dale: It said P-lacebo... it must be made by P-fizer.
%
Dale: Gentlemen, the crap has literally been scared out of me.
%
Dale is talking to Joseph.
Dale Gribble: You're like E.T., except E.T. was a purebred alien with a heart 
of gold. You're only half-alien and at times can be a tad self-absorbed.
%
Both he and his father believing he's an alien, Joseph explains to Bobby why 
Dale suddenly buys him a new large TV
Joseph Gribble: He's just being nice to me so my real dad won't freeze him in 
carbonite and trade him for spice.
%
Dale Gribble: What happens if my tee shot lands on a bird's back and he carries 
it out of bounds but then is attacked by a larger bird who grabs the ball and 
drops it in the hole? Is that still a hole-in-one? Because that's how I'm going 
to play it.
Hank Hill: Dang it, Dale. It already happened once. What are the odds of it 
happening again?
%
Bill Dauterive: I've never had a caddy before. I'm gonna treat him like crap.
%
Kahn has distracted Hank in front of the membership chairman. Ted Wassanasong 
goes to speak to Khan in private
Ted Wassanasong: Damn it, Kahn, do you want to join Nine Rivers?
Khan: Oh yes! Thank you, Ted!
Ted: Welp, you can forget it!
Kahn frowns
Ted: ...Unless you can show Mr. Ho that Hank Hill would be the perfect Nine 
Rivers member.
Kahn Souphanousinphone: What do you want with that chicken-fried loser?
Ted: The PGA has refused to have their tournament at Nine Rivers unless we 
attract at least one non-Asian member. You deliver me Hank, I will put you up 
for junior membership.
Kahn: You will offer me full membership!
Ted: Associate membership?
Kahn: Full membership!
Ted{meekly}: Done!
%
At a market near the Mexico/US border
Dale Gribble: I don't mean to sound racist, but this by far is the best 
selection of beans I have ever seen. I'm serious.
%
Outside the Mexican market. Guys enjoy a long-awaited Alamo Beer, except Bill, 
who eats a banana
Hank: Yup.
Dale: Yup.
Boomhauer: Uh huh.
Bill: Come on Hank. One beer is not going to make me drunk. Look how fat I am.
Hank: Sorry Bill, but that is what you get for having a mouthful of banana when 
we called "not it".
Returning to Arlen. Bill is driving Dale's van
Dale Gribble: Step on it, Bill! I don't know which way it's coming out, but 
it's coming out!
%
Dale Gribble: (vomits) Damn that Mexican banana!
%
Hank Hill: No, you are not tripping, that is an emu.
%
Luanne and other girls enter Omega House. One member takes Luanne's luggage but 
a van pulls up and two men grab her and force her inside
Mother: Lisa, you need help. These men are here to get you back to normal.
Lisa: Who is Lisa? My name is Jane.
Deprogrammer #1: Do not worry young lady, all will be OK. Thank God we got her.
Deprogrammer #2: Yeah, it was a lucky break. This cult has lawyers up the 
ying-yang.
%
[Dale confronts his father.]
Dale Gribble: Prepare to be beaten by the deadliest form of martial arts. 
Monkey style! Ooh, ooh, ahh, ahh!
%
[Dale believes his father is hitting on his wife. Thus, he throws a knife and 
hits a mannequin near them.]
Dale Gribble: Get away from my wife or next time I'll aim for the mannequin and 
hit you.
%
[Dale talks to the audience at a gay rodeo.]
Dale Gribble: Attention homosexuals and so called "bi"-sexuals.
%
Nancy Gribble: This is supposed to be my re-wedding to Dale! My second chance! 
Why is God punishin' me? (looks up with her arms in the air) Why, sug?!
%
Bug Gribble: : Oh my god, Hank! Are you gay?
Hank Hill: What?! No! I sell propane!
%
Nancy Gribble: So, are you really okay with your dad being gay?
Dale Gribble: Why would I have a problem with it? John Redcorn's gay, and I've 
been friends with him for years!
%
Hank: Hey, John Redcorn.
John Redcorn: Hank.
Hank: Uh, yeah, John Redcorn, I had a dream last night. You got a minute?
John Redcorn: Come in. I'll brew some chamomile tea.
Hank: ...and the woman in my dreams, the one without the clothing, was not my 
wife. And needless to say that is not a dream I intended to have.
John Redcorn: My people believe that dreams of the unconscious mind trying to 
solve a problem with the conscious mind cannot. Is there anything unusual going 
on with you?
Hank: Nope. Everything's the same as it's always been for as long as I can 
remember. Yep, same old, same old.
John Redcorn: Is it possible that after 20 years of marriage, you're a little 
tired of your wife?
Hank: What?! That's crazy! Our romantic life is as good as the day we were 
married. It hasn't changed a bit. Yep, we've got a great routine. If I were 
bored of Peggy, I'd be having dreams in which I was bored of Peggy, not 
grilling naked with the neighbor's wife.
John Redcorn: (laughs) Minh.
Hank: Uh, no.
John Redcorn: It's Nancy? My Nancy? You're having dirty dreams about my sweet 
Nan-Nan?
Hank: Say, is that a new suede vest?
John Redcorn: Nancy used to like it when I kept the vest on during sex. Do you 
want it?
Hank: Oh, God!
John Redcorn: Here, take it! Take it all!
Hank: Bah!
John Redcorn: (crying)
%
Marlene: I'm going to be honest with you  I only understand about half of what 
you say. The other times I just nod and smile and wait for your pants to come 
off.
%
Peggy: Bill is picking on Boomhauer? He hasn't done that since he had hair.
%
Luanne: She's not coming back, honey.
%
Bobby: 'Course she is. She's Mr. Boomhauer's girlfriend.
%
Luanne: Let's see, how can I explain this...? You know how you can be happy 
eating vanilla ice cream day after day after day? Well, Mr. Boomhauer isn't 
just like that. See, he likes to try different flavors.
%
Bobby: But he can have a new flavor every day! He's dating the ice cream lady!
%
Luanne: Mr. Boomhauer had grown-up sex with the ice cream lady, and now he's 
dumped her. You're never gonna have ice cream again, Bobby.
%
Dale: We gotta do something. The alley was balanced before. A cool single guy, 
and a cool married guy. A loser single guy, and a loser married guy. Now it's 
me and three losers!
%
Bill: (To Boomhauer) I know how dark it is for you right now; curled up, lying 
in your own emotional vomit. You're in hell now, Boomhauer. And the only way 
out is through a long, dark tunnel. And you're afraid to go in, because there's 
a train comin' at you, carryin' a boxcar full of heartbreak. Well, let me tell 
you something: all you can do is let it hit you. And then try to find your 
legs. I know, I've taken that hit more times than I can remember. Look at me 
Boomhauer, I'm fat, and I'm old, and every day I'm just gonna wake up fatter 
and older. Yet somehow I manage to drag this fat old bald bastard into the 
alley every day. I'm out there diggin' holes, fallin' into them, climbin' out, 
tryin' again, and tomorrow, I'm gonna hang outside at a ladies prison. And the 
first thing those lady cons are gonna see after 20 years? Is me. Will I get 
one? Experience says no. Will I be out there next month? If I'm alive you 
better believe it. You gotta get right back up on that tanning bed, slip into a 
tight t-shirt, wash off some of that cologne, and get yourself out of that 
tunnel and into some strange woman's bed!
%
[Hank meets his Japanese half-brother, who looks astonishingly like him, for 
the first time.]
Hank: Bwah!!!
Junichiro: (In unison with hank) Hwah!!!
%
Junichiro: I kick-a your ass!!!
%
Bobby: Good God! That is the biggest Hello Kitty store I've ever seen!
%
Junichiro: (To Hank) With all respect and honor, I would not be saddened if 
both you and your father went to Hell!
%
[After receiving a message with information about rampaging Cotton's 
whereabouts.]
Junichiro: It is one of the businessmen I exchanged cards with! See? Japanese 
politeness is surprisingly effective! He just saw shinless stranger boarding at 
train station. He say he buy train ticket and... dishonor pay toilet.
%
[After discarding Japanese politeness in favor of American ass-kicking.]
Junichiro: Look at me! Here come Ronald Reagan, Mike Tyson!
%
[Reading letter to Luanne.]
Hank: Hi, my name is Ladybird. I like long walks, my arthritis medication, and 
two cups of kibble a day. I'll try to outsmart you and get three cups, but I 
know you're too clever for that, Ms. Platter. (Giggles)
Luanne: I don't know, Uncle Hank. She did write this letter, and everything.
Hank: Trip's off!
%
Michiko (Junichiro's mother): This arrangement offered me many opportunities 
for difficulty.
%
[Hank and Junichiro have just watch Cotton depart from the train station.]
Junichiro: He will be proud of me. I was abrupt with an elderly woman.
Hank: [sighs] We're too late. Our dad's on his way to spit in the emperor's 
face.
Junichiro: Hwah!!!
%
Hank: (Referring to Bobby's dancing at a concert) They weren't dancing like you 
and I dance. They were...enjoying it.
%
Hank: (Upon Hank finding Bobby holding a Cheerleader uniform) There better be a 
naked cheerleader under your bed.
%
Hank- "If bobby Learns to cook and clean for himself whats his motivation to 
ever get married."
Hank Hill: You shut your got-dang mouth or I'll shove that Ditch Witch down 
your throat and dig a tunnel straight through to sunshine!
%
Big Jim: Ha ha, that's telling him.
%
Hank Hill: 'Felt good, too.
%
Dale Gribble: Back off, Hank, or Octavio will mess you up.
%
Octavio: Gribble, I don't care if he stays or goes. Where's the money you owe 
me, esse?
%
Dale Gribble: You heard him.
%
Big Jim: Take the first shot, Cochise. I love two things: building doll house 
furniture and kicking ass. And I don't see any no houses 'round here. You see 
any doll houses, Hank?
%
Hank Hill: No, I don't.
%
Big Jim: No you don't, that's right! What are you looking at, sport? Don't you 
eyeball me! Don't you eyeball a JUNKYARD DOG! ARF! ARF! ARF! NOW YOU GOT THE 
DOG BARKING! YOU GOT IT! YOU GOT IT! ARF! ARF!
%
[yells, bellows, suddenly grabs his chest and keels over]
%
A garbage truck has fallen into Dales tunnel just seconds after he's gotten out.
Dale Gribble: Now that we're up here, what is so damn important?
%
Hank Hill:I don't have an anger problem, I have an idiot problem!"
%
Bill Dauterive: You cut Dale's finger off for building a tunnel. I once made a 
vest out of your wife's underpants. I can't imagine what you'd do to me.
%
Police Office (thinking it's a domestic abuse situation): It always happens to 
the younger, prettier ones.
%
Dale Gribble: (Yelling at Hank) If it were up to you, you would have filled my 
buddy tunnel with cement, so no one else could use it! (Note the sexual 
innuendo/double entendre, based on context of scene).
%
Didi Hill: Hank has always been angry. When we were in kindergarten, and the 
other children would use the finger paints, he would pinch them.
Hank Hill: You are a BALD FACED LIAR!
%
Hank Hill(To Dale): It's gonna take a lot of hard work to repair this floor, 
and since this is all your fault, Mister, I'm not gonna let you help me.
Bobby Hill:Can I help?
Hank Hill:Yes, Bobby.
%
Dale Gribble:Objection, Conjecture, Objecture!
Hank Hill: That's not even a word!
%
Dale Gribble: I hear Mega Lo Mart is taking bids for a rat problem. Boy, that'd 
be a sweet gig. I could finally start paying for Nancy's health insurance 
instead of just telling Nancy I'm paying for it.
%
Dale Gribble: You still think it's rats. Well, don't beat yourself up, Hank, I 
did too until the evidence pointed to baboon.
Hank Hill: Baboon? Dale, don't tell Glidewell there's a baboon. It's not a 
baboon.
Dale Gribble: I know that. I won't bore you with the details, but bottom line: 
it's Chuck Mangione!
%
Hank Hill: Dale's losing it at Mega Lo Mart, Nancy. We need some traps for the 
rat, and a tranquilizer gun for... uh... also for the rat.
%
Dale Gribble: Well, that's the calculated risk you take when you release a 
mongoose.
%
(Dale and Chuck Mangione argue who's crazier)
Chuck Mangione: You let a mongoose out in the store.
Dale Gribble: You're living in a T.P. fort.
Chuck Mangione: Let's agree to disagree.
%
Boomhauer (In disbelief): Chuck Mangione. He's probably out there in Hollywood, 
you know, sticking his horn to dang ole Minnie Driver.
%
Luanne Platter: I closed my eyes and I was thinking of those stupid guys in my 
math class... oh, and the guy in the parking lot... and that volunteer pool 
cleaner who always comes by when I'm swimming.
Angela: Tell me about it. I once fell for a free breast examination in a bar.
%
Luanne Platter: Yeah, there's nothing worse than people not respecting you. 
Every time I get hooted at I have to take an hour of Tae Bo.
Hank Hill: Tae Bo, is that that new oriental way of moving your couch around?
%
Hank Hill: (after Luanne explains Tae-Bo): Oh, it's dancing.
Bobby Hill: Hmm. That sounds 
Hank Hill: No.
%
Luanne Platter: Guess who I ran into at the gym... Buck Strickland! He watched 
me do Tae Bo and he thinks I'd be a great boxer!
Hank Hill: Look, Luanne, I fought at the Y and trust me, you are no boxer.
Luanne Platter: Yea-huh. Friday at midnight in the bathroom at Sugarfoots, and 
I am going to stand up and fight and be respected just like you said.
Hank Hill: Luanne, the kind of women that box don't have 50 stuffed animals on 
their bed. Why don't you spend Friday night watching one of those movies you 
like, where the people fall in love and then one of them dies?
%
Angela: Men are never going to respect us. That's why we've got to use what God 
or the surgeon gave us to get what they got: Money.
Luanne Platter: So you'd do anything for money?
Angela: Or a car.
%
John Redcorn: Hank, this is an important ritual among my people. Don't half-ass 
it.
%
Peggy: It's for the freakin' children!
%
Cotton Hill: In my day, the principal was the meanest sum-bitch God ever put on 
one leg. He'd lean on a desk with both hands, and swing his leg at ya! Then, 
when you were standing there shocked that a one-legged man had kicked ya...he'd 
bite ya!
%
Bobby Hill: The clock radio smells like my Game Boy, but it tastes like my 
library card. I wonder if it smells different when it's on...
%
Dale Gribble: Look at all those pests out there. I wonder if we'll ever win 
this war.
Sheila: Don't you just find the mating habits of animals fascinating? When a 
pigeon wants to mate, it makes this noise. Coo. Coo.
Dale Gribble: Interesting. When cockroaches want to mate, they flush all the 
air out their book gloves. It sounds kinda like (gasp).
Sheila: Coo. Coo.
Dale Gribble: (gasp)
Sheila: Well, it's getting late. You want to go downstairs. I got us a room, 
I'm warming up some brandy in the coffeemaker.
Dale Gribble: Wait a second. Are you attempting to know me?
Sheila: Dale, you're one of the sweetest, gentlest, funniest men I've ever met.
Dale Gribble: True, but Sheila, I'm married.
Sheila: It's just us tonight. (She tries to kiss Dale)
Dale Gribble: Oh no, Missy. There are 3 people here tonight. You, me, and my 
wife. I've taken two oaths in my life: One to the NRA, and the other to Nancy 
Hicks-Gribble. Nay, Nancy Hicks. I stood in front of God and all my friends, 
swearing to be an honorable and truthful man. So I'm not going to lie, I, I 
have felt a very small, insect-like attraction for you. But my wife is the 
greatest woman there ever was! I think you should go. (Sheila leaves) (pigeons 
cooing) Jeez, woman, take a hint. You heard me. I love my wife.
%
Hank gives a toast at Patch's rehearsal dinner.
Hank Hill: Hank Hill, best man, Strickland Propane.
%
Patch tries to shift the blame after being found out by his fiancee
Patch Boomhauer: It was... Hank! Hank loves hookers!
%
Hank Hill: Can't you see you're not making Christianity better, you're just 
making rock and roll worse?
%
Dale Gribble: So it turns out I'm not the actual Dale Gribble, but a clone of 
him. The original Dale Gribble is a super-warrior from the year 2087. The 
second me, i.e. I, was created to help the first me fight the invading Mongol 
armies.
Hank Hill: Dale, that's asinine, and here's four reasons why. First, you're not 
gonna clone a super-warrior out of a guy who can't even win a thumb-wrestling 
match. Two, you've spent your life swearing that the robots will eliminate the 
clones by the year 2010, so which is it, robots or clones? Three, you've 
already said you sympathize with the invading Mongolians of 2087, so you'd be 
the last one they'd send to fight them. And four, if you were from the future, 
you would have seen this coming.
%
Hank punches Dale in the arm.
Peggy: Hank, there's something I have to tell you.
Hank: You did what?!
%
Kahn is watching the Hills through binoculars.
Kahn: Minh! Come quick! Hank and Peggy having old-school red-neck domestic 
squabble on front lawn!
%
Mihn runs in with binoculars.
Hank: How could you, Peggy?
Minh: Oh, I bet she burn the meat loaf!
Hank: It caused what?
Minh: Why he point at his crotch like that?
Hank: 20% shrinkage?! You want me to put a patch on my what?!
Kahn: OK, this going in a weird direction now.
%
Richard's vulgarity has gone too far; he has alienated the entire staff. Buck 
Strickland terminates Richard's employment at Strickland Propane
One day later
Sign: HELP WANTED
Hank: Okay team, gather 'round. I'm going to tell you about the new 
improvements on the Vogner 2800 series. The first thing is that it will smoke 
your meat. And it's got a nice big rack for your buns.
Enrique: Or wieners.
Hank: Or wieners. Why not?
Joe Jack: Feels good to say "wieners" again.
Donna: And sausage.
%
The park ranger wishes all of the hippies well as they finally leave the park.
Park Ranger!: Good Riddance! Go to Hell!
%
Bobby Hill: I ate hippie gumbo!
%
During the middle of a flood, the town seeks shelter in the school gym.
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Chaos already ruling. This like when city of Luang 
Prabang fall, and we snag sweet diplomatic license plates!
%
Bill: Gee, Hank. How's it feel to be the father of a genius?
Hank: Bobby's a good kid, but he's no genius. We have the report card to prove 
it. And since when is pop culture a considered "academic"?
Dale: It's a very big deal, Hank. Nowadays, you can't be an accredited college 
without offering a major in commercial jingles, or the films of M. Night 
Shaylamalamon.
%
Bobby is studying all the multiple shows on the many Mega-Lo Mart TVs when he 
goes into a stress trip.
Kelly Clarkson: I'm Kelly Clarkson. I won American Idol and my debut album went 
to #1. One song on the album, I wrote with Chistina Aguilera. She was on the 
Mickey Mouse Club with Britney Spears and Justin Timberlake. (voice speeding 
up) Justin is a member of N*Sync. They sing on the soundtrack for the Grinch 
starring Jim Carry. (voice going even faster) Jim Carry was in a movie with 
Rene Zelwigger, who's worked with Cathrine Zeta-Jones, who's acted with John 
Cusack, who has a house in Malibu near Pamela Anderson, who dated Scott Baio, 
who was on Happy Days with Ron Howard, who directed Apollo 13 starring Tom 
Hanks, who's married to Rita Wilson, who was in... (voice is now inaudibly out 
of control)
%
Bobby starts passing out.
Joe Jack: How is your back, honey?
Hank Hill: Great Joe Jack, how is your gambling problem?
%
Hank Hill: Dang it, I am sick and tired of everyone's asinine ideas about me. 
I'm not a redneck, and I'm not some Hollywood jerk. I'm something else 
entirely. I'm... I'm complicated!
%
Little girl:( as she notices the cattle coming) Look, Mommy! Moo cow!
%
While staying in a time-share condominium in Mexico, Cotton comments on the 
quality of the bottled water in the room.
Cotton Hill: They got the water what don't give you the hot poops!
%
Bill Dauterive(Bill's card has been denied) I've Got other Cards, Do you take 
Blockbuster
Hank Hill: Why would anyone do drugs when they can just mow a lawn
%
Bobby is mocking Hank when Hank is mistaken as female on his driver's license
Bobby Hill: Now where did I put my pantyhose?
%
Dale Gribble: I'm all jacked up on America right now! Anyone want to hear me 
recite the Constitution?
%
Dale Gribble: Bill! Bill, you have to be the stupidest man on the planet to 
think this is a good idea! Have you seen what you're wearing? That outfit makes 
you look like a sequined train wreck! Look at you! You're part of a 
twelve-headed jackass! This chorus is the feces that is produced when shame 
eats too much stupidity! You people make me envy the deaf and the blind! 
Guhbuh! Underwear! Money! Fat! Ngyuh... (Dale collapses)
%
Hank: I still can't believe Bobby cheated on his paper route. I don't even know 
know how to punish that.
Peggy: Well, the pressures of journalism can be very intense, even I have felt 
it. But today, I really knocked one out of the park.
Hank: Well, good for you, what's the hint?
Peggy: Okay, get this. I combined two common items in a powerful new way. I 
told my readers to harness the cleaning power of ammonia with the whitening 
power of bleach.
Hank: Ammonia and bleach? You told people to mix ammonia and bleach?
Peggy: Only if they want bathroom fixtures that shine like the sun.
Hank: Peggy, that's the recipe for mustard gas. Arlen will be covered with a 
cloud of poison
Peggy: BWAH!
%
Kahn Souphanousinphone: I will now tell stories of my childhood in Laos. 
Growing up in the village, I had two chickens. One of these was named "Phouma." 
I don't recall the name of the other chicken. Sometimes I would put both 
chickens in the wheelbarrow. This was very funny.
%
(Meeting a famous Laotian soldier named Nguc Phong)
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Hey, Minh, this guy serious butt-kicker! Anyway, I 
sorry they kill all your friends.
Nguc Phong: Yes, that was unhappy for me.
%
(Kahn gives Ted Wassanasong his parading clothes back)
Ted Wassanasong: I don't understand. How do you expect to parade around without 
your uniform?
Kahn Souphanousinphone: Oh, my parading days are over. (Ted Wassanasong stares 
at him) It's like this, if you want someone to play golf with, give me call. If 
you want someone to feel guilty about the way they choose to live, call someone 
else!
%
Lucky: My father said he wouldn't get married until he became the Disputed 
Heavyweight Wrestling Champion of the World.
%
Hank: Uhhhhh. Did your father ever become the Heavyweight wrestling Champion of 
the World?
%
Lucky: No, neither he qualified for the weight. And my grandfather said he 
wouldn't get married until he spoke perfect French.
%
Peggy: Oh, I don't think old grandpa ever got past saying "Bonjour".
%
Lucky: Nope.
%
Hank: Well I hate those pants more than life itself
%
Joseph: Oh man, he's really got it going on. Wait, did I just sound like a 
chick?
%
Hank is playing a Grand Theft Auto style video game called "Pro-Pain!"
Hank Hill: Oh, God, I just stabbed a parking attendant! Where's the button to 
turn myself in?
%
Hank Character in Pro-Pain!: I tell you what!
%
Hank Character in Pro-Pain!: Taste the meat and the heat!
%
Bobby and all of his classmates are marching down the street protesting.
Old Man 1: Here they come to kill us. Oh well.
Old Man 2: I liked it when we could just stick 'em in factories.
%
Alejandro: We want a plane to Disney World. And 100 gallons of diesel fuel!
Olivia: And we're not leaving until we get some Yuengling!
%
Joseph is dressed as a Powder Puff cheerleader and is told to redress into his 
normal clothing.
Joseph Gribble: But I'm so pretty!
%
Hank: Hey Bobby. How was the surf today? Did Boomhauer do his famous flamingo? 
That's when he stands on one leg, that's not easy to do, even on the ground.
Bobby: No, all he did was fall flat on his face and embarrass himself, and as 
by association, we didn't even get to ride the wave.
Hank: Boomhauer was embarrassed? <sighs> I don't know what the heck's going on 
here but someone needs to get their asses kicked.
Bobby: Finally. Yes. Thank you. It's time to kick their local asses!
Hank: Bobby, language. But, yes. I am going to kick their asses.
%
Cotton:(After kicking down a wall Hank just finshed making) "That was in my 
way!"
Peggy: It's okay. I'm here, you can go now. Go, go into the light. The light is 
good. You can just let go now.
Cotton: Mr. Reaper, I'd prefer that you put your hood back on.
Peggy: Why won't you die?
Cotton: This was supposed to happen to you. You're worthless. You're not even 
good enough to be married to my worthless nothing of a loser son!
Peggy: Enough! Your son has always loved you despite your constant torture. You 
want to die alone? Fine. You want to keep coming back and never die? That's 
fine too. In fact, I hope you do go on living forever as the unhappy person you 
are in the hell you have created here on this earth. I hope you live forever. I 
really do.
Cotton: Do you now. (cackles, then dies as his heart monitor goes off)
%
Dale: (After blowing up the shack that Hank just built because Hank's father 
wanted it destroyed) "Yee-haw! That was for you colonel!" (runs off)
%
Lucky: Lucky is on the case. That's usually what I say when I drink beer, but 
this time it refers to this mystery.
%
Kahn: Lucky Kleinschmidt,it was you and Luanne wasn't it? You trying to get in 
as much hanky-panky as you can before she has her baby?
Lucky: Not that there's anything wrong with your premise but no, it wasn't us.
Luanne: We haven't done in public since Lucky almost fell off a Ferris wheel.
%
(Kahn trying to find out who had sex in a train lavatory)
Bill: I don't have an alibi.
Kahn: You're Bill Dauterive, that's your alibi.
%
Lucky: You really enjoyed yourself this evening, didn't you Aunt Peggy?
Peggy: (gasps) You know?
Lucky: Good for you. Happy Birthday Aunt Peggy.
%
Dale Gribble: Well, Joseph went to his first sleepover last night. Didn't go so 
well, he's a cuddler, so I had to go pick him up.
%
After Dale tells Hank he saw him driving away from the explosion:
Peggy Hill: (Whispers) Oh, Hank! You must cover your tracks! We'll have to kill 
Dale!
%
Bobby Hill: Dad, I'm confused. So you should trust people until they betray 
you, and then try to blow them up?
%
Luanne: Normal people buy things with credit cards.
%
Lucky: Are you saying that Georgers are not normal people because they pay for 
things with cash?
%
[Hank is helping Lucky with his credit card application]
Hank: Here under employer you put Costco, you never worked for Costco.
%
Lucky: No, but Costco gave me the slip on pee-pee money for my settlement.
%
Hank: Pee-pee money is not an employment history and look, you left your social 
security number blank here [points to blank spot on Lucky's application].
%
Lucky: Oh, I don't have one of them social cards or a driver's license. My dad 
always said a man's wallet should only hold cash, razor blade and a lucky poker 
chip.
%
Dale: Gentlemen, I'm sure you recall my long dreamt dream about building a 
guard tower in my yard.
%
Hank: Dale, the zoning board has turned you down six times and the last refusal 
was with extreme prejudice.
%
Dale: True, but for a structure under 40 feet no variance is needed. Soon 
you'll live under the protection of my 39 foot guard tower! The zoning board 
has no say.
%
Hank: Dale, that is [Dale cuts him off mid-sentence]...
%
Dale: NO SAY!
%
Hoyt: (giving Bobby a gift) Here's something for this kid of yours.
%
Bobby: My name is Bobby, Uncle Hoyt.
%
Peggy:[sings to the tune of "La Cucaracha"] La Peggy Hill cha, la Peggy Hill 
cha! Doin' dishes in the sink.
%
Hank: Well, we're doing great on our list, Lucky. Later today we'll go see my 
guy about a will, you want to make sure the right people inherit your debts.
%
Hoyt: I'll be back so quick you'll call me...Quickie McGee!
%
Hoyt:I'm a lot better now, here I owe you. [takes out some cigarettes from the 
pack and hands them to Lucky] See, on the oil rig, these are like money.
%
Lucky: Dad,were you in the state oil rig or in the federal?
%
Hoyt: Smart man. [lays more cigarettes on the patio table] That means we're 
like family. Say I got 10 cigarettes and you pay me 10 more for watching your 
back. Now how many I got?
%
Lucky: Twenty.
%
Hoyt: No! Only 15 cause I gotta pay a tax to the guard.
%
Lucky: Cigarette math is full of surprises.
%
Kahn: Inspector, fine this redneck for reckless redneck-itude!
%
[after Hoyt lands his 3rd strike and will be serving a lifetime prison sentence]
Luanne: I'm just sad that Daddy had to back to his oil rig again.[turns to 
Lucky] He would be so proud of you.
%
Hank: Well, he sure would but they really need him on that oil rig. Otherwise 
they wouldn't have given him a life time contract.
%
Peggy: Oil is very important to America.
%
Luanne: Even more important than propane?
%
Hank: Uh...yes Luanne. Oil is even more important...than propane.
%
Hank: Dr. Weissman, my friend Bill would like to register a complaint.
Dr. Weissman: Ohh, are you upset or something? I said you had diabetes, not 
cry-a-betes.
Bill: You told me I was going to lose my legs!
Dr. Weissman: No, I said your legs could fail one day, possibly. I-I never said 
anything that could constitute malpractice, other it's current definition.
Bill: Hmm, my legs work just fine. Isn't that inspiring! (Bill closes the door 
and starts beating up Dr. Weissman)
Hank: (to nurse) Uh, my friend is just, uh...
Nurse: I don't hear a thing.
%
Hank: About that science teacher of yours, does he ever talk about, uh, going 
green?
Bobby: I don't know. Do you ever talk about propane? My point is, he talks 
about all the time.
%
Ted Wassanasong: This was no act of God; look at those sledgehammer marks! It 
was the act of rednecks, on a drunken rampage.
%
Dale: (After they rebuild neighbor's house) We should do this to Bill's house 
when he dies.
%
Bill: What a nice lady. We used to talk about puppies and serial killers 
through the fence.
%
Lucky: I've seen a lot of nature documentaries and I find that most of life's 
questions can be answered with another question: what would a monkey do?
%
Hank Hill: Aw, you're (his new grand-niece) a cute one, I tell you what.
%
[Looking for a party]
Buck Strickland: Son, what's the bad part of Memphis called?
Jody "Ray Roy" Strickland: Memphis!
%
Emcee: We're here to honor one of the giants of Texas propane, Mr. Buck 
Strickland. To introduce Mr. Strickland, his right-hand man, Hank Hill.
Hank: (Hank walks onto the stage drunk and knocks down the emcee) I'm not going 
to say, hell, I am going to say what I have been wanting to say. Buck 
Strickland is a monster, a drunk monster. Buck Strickland is nothing but a 
lecherous disgusting bastard-making bastard (slurred gibberish). And now I'm 
going to vomit. (he vomits on a guest's head)
%
Buck has set up a "hospitality suite", consisting of liquor and hookers for the 
men of the Propane Gas Consortium
Pollard Wigand: I am in my third term as President of the Propane Gas 
Consortium. Prostitute giggles
Lobby. Peggy is with the wives of the Consortium
Peggy: All propane men make mistakes sometimes, including your husbands.
Peggy takes elevator towards Buck's hospitality suite
Buck's room. Consortium is with hookers
Buck: Well, now that everyone's got a pretty girl on his lap, I would like to 
discuss leniency for my employee, Hank Hill.
Pollard Wigand: Setup!
Buck: Ray Roy, lock the door.
Jody secures door, hookers wrestle men to ground as Buck snaps a photo
Buck: Now, you are all reasonable men. I think surely you can find forgiveness 
in your heart for old Hank, and it would be good to do it before your wives get 
here.
Peggy is in hallway with wives, approaching Buck's suite
Pollard Wigand: You win, Buck.
Buck gives signal to his son, who uses cellphone
Peggy{on cell phone}: Y'ello?
Jody Strickland: Get their hair done.
Peggy walks past Buck's suite
%
Dale: (Imitating Survivorman) There is no greater survival skill that the 
ability to start a fire without matches. Fortunately Arlen is rich in natural 
propane tank deposits.
%
Dale opens the propane nozzle. He tries to get his lighter to work. The tank 
explodes.
Kahn: Hey Hank Hill, I knew rednecks abandon cars and refrigerators, guess we 
can throw kids on the list too! Hahahaha!
Bobby: Not one of [these girls] has seen my "Flatulent Monkey Visits the Post 
Office" routine!
%
Peggy has asked for a cassette tape at a CD store. A man walks up to the clerk 
who is assisting Peggy.
Man: Hey, do you have that song that goes, "Wah-nah-nah-nah-nah scroun-scrouna 
Wah-nah-nah-nah-nah scroun-scrouna?"
Clerk: (To Peggy) I gotta... yeah.
%
[Nancy and her new coworkers are drinking inside of their news helicopter.]
Nancy: Vodka, this is chopper one. Traffic is clear from my mouth to my stomach.
Gwen St. James: Hey, give me the keys, Nancy. I want to go buzz my ex-husband's 
girlfriend's condo. (laughs)
Wade Bixby: [shouting out the window] I'm... Wade... Bixby!
%
[Dale and Bill are wrestling over a beer can.]
Kahn Souphinousaphone: Chain-smoking anorexic vs. that heart attack waiting to 
happen! Who will die first? Let's watch!
%
Cotton Hill: (In a letter) "Hank, if you're readin' this it means Fatty's dead. 
So I have to leave this task to the one most likely to screw it up: You."
%
[The series' last lines]
Bobby: Well, Dad, it looks like this is the last one.
Hank: Oh, you're just getting started, Bobby. You'll be grilling your whole 
life.
Bobby: Just like you.
Hank: Yep.
Bobby: Yep.
%